                   1
From fairest creatures we desire increase,
That thereby beauty's rose might never die,
But as the riper should by time decease,
His tender heir might bear his memory:
But thou contracted to thine own bright eyes,
Feed'st thy light's flame with self-substantial fuel,
Making a famine where abundance lies,
Thy self thy foe, to thy sweet self too cruel:
Thou that art now the world's fresh ornament,
And only herald to the gaudy spring,
Within thine own bud buriest thy content,
And tender churl mak'st waste in niggarding:
  Pity the world, or else this glutton be,
  To eat the world's due, by the grave and thee.


                   2
When forty winters shall besiege thy brow,
And dig deep trenches in thy beauty's field,
Thy youth's proud livery so gazed on now,
Will be a tattered weed of small worth held:
Then being asked, where all thy beauty lies,
Where all the treasure of thy lusty days;
To say within thine own deep sunken eyes,
Were an all-eating shame, and thriftless praise.
How much more praise deserved thy beauty's use,
If thou couldst answer 'This fair child of mine
Shall sum my count, and make my old excuse'
Proving his beauty by succession thine.
  This were to be new made when thou art old,
  And see thy blood warm when thou feel'st it cold.


                   3
Look in thy glass and tell the face thou viewest,
Now is the time that face should form another,
Whose fresh repair if now thou not renewest,
Thou dost beguile the world, unbless some mother.
For where is she so fair whose uneared womb
Disdains the tillage of thy husbandry?
Or who is he so fond will be the tomb,
Of his self-love to stop posterity?
Thou art thy mother's glass and she in thee
Calls back the lovely April of her prime,
So thou through windows of thine age shalt see,
Despite of wrinkles this thy golden time.
  But if thou live remembered not to be,
  Die single and thine image dies with thee.


                   4
Unthrifty loveliness why dost thou spend,
Upon thy self thy beauty's legacy?
Nature's bequest gives nothing but doth lend,
And being frank she lends to those are free:
Then beauteous niggard why dost thou abuse,
The bounteous largess given thee to give?
Profitless usurer why dost thou use
So great a sum of sums yet canst not live?
For having traffic with thy self alone,
Thou of thy self thy sweet self dost deceive,
Then how when nature calls thee to be gone,
What acceptable audit canst thou leave?
  Thy unused beauty must be tombed with thee,
  Which used lives th' executor to be.


                   5
Those hours that with gentle work did frame
The lovely gaze where every eye doth dwell
Will play the tyrants to the very same,
And that unfair which fairly doth excel:
For never-resting time leads summer on
To hideous winter and confounds him there,
Sap checked with frost and lusty leaves quite gone,
Beauty o'er-snowed and bareness every where:
Then were not summer's distillation left
A liquid prisoner pent in walls of glass,
Beauty's effect with beauty were bereft,
Nor it nor no remembrance what it was.
  But flowers distilled though they with winter meet,
  Leese but their show, their substance still lives sweet.


                   6
Then let not winter's ragged hand deface,
In thee thy summer ere thou be distilled:
Make sweet some vial; treasure thou some place,
With beauty's treasure ere it be self-killed:
That use is not forbidden usury,
Which happies those that pay the willing loan;
That's for thy self to breed another thee,
Or ten times happier be it ten for one,
Ten times thy self were happier than thou art,
If ten of thine ten times refigured thee:
Then what could death do if thou shouldst depart,
Leaving thee living in posterity?
  Be not self-willed for thou art much too fair,
  To be death's conquest and make worms thine heir.


                   7
Lo in the orient when the gracious light
Lifts up his burning head, each under eye
Doth homage to his new-appearing sight,
Serving with looks his sacred majesty,
And having climbed the steep-up heavenly hill,
Resembling strong youth in his middle age,
Yet mortal looks adore his beauty still,
Attending on his golden pilgrimage:
But when from highmost pitch with weary car,
Like feeble age he reeleth from the day,
The eyes (fore duteous) now converted are
From his low tract and look another way:
  So thou, thy self out-going in thy noon:
  Unlooked on diest unless thou get a son.


                   8
Music to hear, why hear'st thou music sadly?
Sweets with sweets war not, joy delights in joy:
Why lov'st thou that which thou receiv'st not gladly,
Or else receiv'st with pleasure thine annoy?
If the true concord of well-tuned sounds,
By unions married do offend thine ear,
They do but sweetly chide thee, who confounds
In singleness the parts that thou shouldst bear:
Mark how one string sweet husband to another,
Strikes each in each by mutual ordering;
Resembling sire, and child, and happy mother,
Who all in one, one pleasing note do sing:
  Whose speechless song being many, seeming one,
  Sings this to thee, 'Thou single wilt prove none'.


                   9
Is it for fear to wet a widow's eye,
That thou consum'st thy self in single life?
Ah, if thou issueless shalt hap to die,
The world will wail thee like a makeless wife,
The world will be thy widow and still weep,
That thou no form of thee hast left behind,
When every private widow well may keep,
By children's eyes, her husband's shape in mind:
Look what an unthrift in the world doth spend
Shifts but his place, for still the world enjoys it;
But beauty's waste hath in the world an end,
And kept unused the user so destroys it:
  No love toward others in that bosom sits
  That on himself such murd'rous shame commits.


                   10
For shame deny that thou bear'st love to any
Who for thy self art so unprovident.
Grant if thou wilt, thou art beloved of many,
But that thou none lov'st is most evident:
For thou art so possessed with murd'rous hate,
That 'gainst thy self thou stick'st not to conspire,
Seeking that beauteous roof to ruinate
Which to repair should be thy chief desire:
O change thy thought, that I may change my mind,
Shall hate be fairer lodged than gentle love?
Be as thy presence is gracious and kind,
Or to thy self at least kind-hearted prove,
  Make thee another self for love of me,
  That beauty still may live in thine or thee.


                   11
As fast as thou shalt wane so fast thou grow'st,
In one of thine, from that which thou departest,
And that fresh blood which youngly thou bestow'st,
Thou mayst call thine, when thou from youth convertest,
Herein lives wisdom, beauty, and increase,
Without this folly, age, and cold decay,
If all were minded so, the times should cease,
And threescore year would make the world away:
Let those whom nature hath not made for store,
Harsh, featureless, and rude, barrenly perish:
Look whom she best endowed, she gave thee more;
Which bounteous gift thou shouldst in bounty cherish:
  She carved thee for her seal, and meant thereby,
  Thou shouldst print more, not let that copy die.


                   12
When I do count the clock that tells the time,
And see the brave day sunk in hideous night,
When I behold the violet past prime,
And sable curls all silvered o'er with white:
When lofty trees I see barren of leaves,
Which erst from heat did canopy the herd
And summer's green all girded up in sheaves
Borne on the bier with white and bristly beard:
Then of thy beauty do I question make
That thou among the wastes of time must go,
Since sweets and beauties do themselves forsake,
And die as fast as they see others grow,
  And nothing 'gainst Time's scythe can make defence
  Save breed to brave him, when he takes thee hence.


                   13
O that you were your self, but love you are
No longer yours, than you your self here live,
Against this coming end you should prepare,
And your sweet semblance to some other give.
So should that beauty which you hold in lease
Find no determination, then you were
Your self again after your self's decease,
When your sweet issue your sweet form should bear.
Who lets so fair a house fall to decay,
Which husbandry in honour might uphold,
Against the stormy gusts of winter's day
And barren rage of death's eternal cold?
  O none but unthrifts, dear my love you know,
  You had a father, let your son say so.


                   14
Not from the stars do I my judgement pluck,
And yet methinks I have astronomy,
But not to tell of good, or evil luck,
Of plagues, of dearths, or seasons' quality,
Nor can I fortune to brief minutes tell;
Pointing to each his thunder, rain and wind,
Or say with princes if it shall go well
By oft predict that I in heaven find.
But from thine eyes my knowledge I derive,
And constant stars in them I read such art
As truth and beauty shall together thrive
If from thy self, to store thou wouldst convert:
  Or else of thee this I prognosticate,
  Thy end is truth's and beauty's doom and date.


                   15
When I consider every thing that grows
Holds in perfection but a little moment.
That this huge stage presenteth nought but shows
Whereon the stars in secret influence comment.
When I perceive that men as plants increase,
Cheered and checked even by the self-same sky:
Vaunt in their youthful sap, at height decrease,
And wear their brave state out of memory.
Then the conceit of this inconstant stay,
Sets you most rich in youth before my sight,
Where wasteful time debateth with decay
To change your day of youth to sullied night,
  And all in war with Time for love of you,
  As he takes from you, I engraft you new.


                   16
But wherefore do not you a mightier way
Make war upon this bloody tyrant Time?
And fortify your self in your decay
With means more blessed than my barren rhyme?
Now stand you on the top of happy hours,
And many maiden gardens yet unset,
With virtuous wish would bear you living flowers,
Much liker than your painted counterfeit:
So should the lines of life that life repair
Which this (Time's pencil) or my pupil pen
Neither in inward worth nor outward fair
Can make you live your self in eyes of men.
  To give away your self, keeps your self still,
  And you must live drawn by your own sweet skill.


                   17
Who will believe my verse in time to come
If it were filled with your most high deserts?
Though yet heaven knows it is but as a tomb
Which hides your life, and shows not half your parts:
If I could write the beauty of your eyes,
And in fresh numbers number all your graces,
The age to come would say this poet lies,
Such heavenly touches ne'er touched earthly faces.
So should my papers (yellowed with their age)
Be scorned, like old men of less truth than tongue,
And your true rights be termed a poet's rage,
And stretched metre of an antique song.
  But were some child of yours alive that time,
  You should live twice in it, and in my rhyme.


                   18
Shall I compare thee to a summer's day?
Thou art more lovely and more temperate:
Rough winds do shake the darling buds of May,
And summer's lease hath all too short a date:
Sometime too hot the eye of heaven shines,
And often is his gold complexion dimmed,
And every fair from fair sometime declines,
By chance, or nature's changing course untrimmed:
But thy eternal summer shall not fade,
Nor lose possession of that fair thou ow'st,
Nor shall death brag thou wand'rest in his shade,
When in eternal lines to time thou grow'st,
  So long as men can breathe or eyes can see,
  So long lives this, and this gives life to thee.


                   19
Devouring Time blunt thou the lion's paws,
And make the earth devour her own sweet brood,
Pluck the keen teeth from the fierce tiger's jaws,
And burn the long-lived phoenix, in her blood,
Make glad and sorry seasons as thou fleet'st,
And do whate'er thou wilt swift-footed Time
To the wide world and all her fading sweets:
But I forbid thee one most heinous crime,
O carve not with thy hours my love's fair brow,
Nor draw no lines there with thine antique pen,
Him in thy course untainted do allow,
For beauty's pattern to succeeding men.
  Yet do thy worst old Time: despite thy wrong,
  My love shall in my verse ever live young.


                   20
A woman's face with nature's own hand painted,
Hast thou the master mistress of my passion,
A woman's gentle heart but not acquainted
With shifting change as is false women's fashion,
An eye more bright than theirs, less false in rolling:
Gilding the object whereupon it gazeth,
A man in hue all hues in his controlling,
Which steals men's eyes and women's souls amazeth.
And for a woman wert thou first created,
Till nature as she wrought thee fell a-doting,
And by addition me of thee defeated,
By adding one thing to my purpose nothing.
  But since she pricked thee out for women's pleasure,
  Mine be thy love and thy love's use their treasure.


                   21
So is it not with me as with that muse,
Stirred by a painted beauty to his verse,
Who heaven it self for ornament doth use,
And every fair with his fair doth rehearse,
Making a couplement of proud compare
With sun and moon, with earth and sea's rich gems:
With April's first-born flowers and all things rare,
That heaven's air in this huge rondure hems.
O let me true in love but truly write,
And then believe me, my love is as fair,
As any mother's child, though not so bright
As those gold candles fixed in heaven's air:
  Let them say more that like of hearsay well,
  I will not praise that purpose not to sell.


                   22
My glass shall not persuade me I am old,
So long as youth and thou are of one date,
But when in thee time's furrows I behold,
Then look I death my days should expiate.
For all that beauty that doth cover thee,
Is but the seemly raiment of my heart,
Which in thy breast doth live, as thine in me,
How can I then be elder than thou art?
O therefore love be of thyself so wary,
As I not for my self, but for thee will,
Bearing thy heart which I will keep so chary
As tender nurse her babe from faring ill.
  Presume not on thy heart when mine is slain,
  Thou gav'st me thine not to give back again.


                   23
As an unperfect actor on the stage,
Who with his fear is put beside his part,
Or some fierce thing replete with too much rage,
Whose strength's abundance weakens his own heart;
So I for fear of trust, forget to say,
The perfect ceremony of love's rite,
And in mine own love's strength seem to decay,
O'ercharged with burthen of mine own love's might:
O let my looks be then the eloquence,
And dumb presagers of my speaking breast,
Who plead for love, and look for recompense,
More than that tongue that more hath more expressed.
  O learn to read what silent love hath writ,
  To hear with eyes belongs to love's fine wit.


                   24
Mine eye hath played the painter and hath stelled,
Thy beauty's form in table of my heart,
My body is the frame wherein 'tis held,
And perspective it is best painter's art.
For through the painter must you see his skill,
To find where your true image pictured lies,
Which in my bosom's shop is hanging still,
That hath his windows glazed with thine eyes:
Now see what good turns eyes for eyes have done,
Mine eyes have drawn thy shape, and thine for me
Are windows to my breast, where-through the sun
Delights to peep, to gaze therein on thee;
  Yet eyes this cunning want to grace their art,
  They draw but what they see, know not the heart.


                   25
Let those who are in favour with their stars,
Of public honour and proud titles boast,
Whilst I whom fortune of such triumph bars
Unlooked for joy in that I honour most;
Great princes' favourites their fair leaves spread,
But as the marigold at the sun's eye,
And in themselves their pride lies buried,
For at a frown they in their glory die.
The painful warrior famoused for fight,
After a thousand victories once foiled,
Is from the book of honour razed quite,
And all the rest forgot for which he toiled:
  Then happy I that love and am beloved
  Where I may not remove nor be removed.


                   26
Lord of my love, to whom in vassalage
Thy merit hath my duty strongly knit;
To thee I send this written embassage
To witness duty, not to show my wit.
Duty so great, which wit so poor as mine
May make seem bare, in wanting words to show it;
But that I hope some good conceit of thine
In thy soul's thought (all naked) will bestow it:
Till whatsoever star that guides my moving,
Points on me graciously with fair aspect,
And puts apparel on my tattered loving,
To show me worthy of thy sweet respect,
  Then may I dare to boast how I do love thee,
  Till then, not show my head where thou mayst prove me.


                   27
Weary with toil, I haste me to my bed,
The dear respose for limbs with travel tired,
But then begins a journey in my head
To work my mind, when body's work's expired.
For then my thoughts (from far where I abide)
Intend a zealous pilgrimage to thee,
And keep my drooping eyelids open wide,
Looking on darkness which the blind do see.
Save that my soul's imaginary sight
Presents thy shadow to my sightless view,
Which like a jewel (hung in ghastly night)
Makes black night beauteous, and her old face new.
  Lo thus by day my limbs, by night my mind,
  For thee, and for my self, no quiet find.


                   28
How can I then return in happy plight
That am debarred the benefit of rest?
When day's oppression is not eased by night,
But day by night and night by day oppressed.
And each (though enemies to either's reign)
Do in consent shake hands to torture me,
The one by toil, the other to complain
How far I toil, still farther off from thee.
I tell the day to please him thou art bright,
And dost him grace when clouds do blot the heaven:
So flatter I the swart-complexioned night,
When sparkling stars twire not thou gild'st the even.
  But day doth daily draw my sorrows longer,
  And night doth nightly make grief's length seem stronger


                   29
When in disgrace with Fortune and men's eyes,
I all alone beweep my outcast state,
And trouble deaf heaven with my bootless cries,
And look upon my self and curse my fate,
Wishing me like to one more rich in hope,
Featured like him, like him with friends possessed,
Desiring this man's art, and that man's scope,
With what I most enjoy contented least,
Yet in these thoughts my self almost despising,
Haply I think on thee, and then my state,
(Like to the lark at break of day arising
From sullen earth) sings hymns at heaven's gate,
  For thy sweet love remembered such wealth brings,
  That then I scorn to change my state with kings.


                   30
When to the sessions of sweet silent thought,
I summon up remembrance of things past,
I sigh the lack of many a thing I sought,
And with old woes new wail my dear time's waste:
Then can I drown an eye (unused to flow)
For precious friends hid in death's dateless night,
And weep afresh love's long since cancelled woe,
And moan th' expense of many a vanished sight.
Then can I grieve at grievances foregone,
And heavily from woe to woe tell o'er
The sad account of fore-bemoaned moan,
Which I new pay as if not paid before.
  But if the while I think on thee (dear friend)
  All losses are restored, and sorrows end.


                   31
Thy bosom is endeared with all hearts,
Which I by lacking have supposed dead,
And there reigns love and all love's loving parts,
And all those friends which I thought buried.
How many a holy and obsequious tear
Hath dear religious love stol'n from mine eye,
As interest of the dead, which now appear,
But things removed that hidden in thee lie.
Thou art the grave where buried love doth live,
Hung with the trophies of my lovers gone,
Who all their parts of me to thee did give,
That due of many, now is thine alone.
  Their images I loved, I view in thee,
  And thou (all they) hast all the all of me.


                   32
If thou survive my well-contented day,
When that churl death my bones with dust shall cover
And shalt by fortune once more re-survey
These poor rude lines of thy deceased lover:
Compare them with the bett'ring of the time,
And though they be outstripped by every pen,
Reserve them for my love, not for their rhyme,
Exceeded by the height of happier men.
O then vouchsafe me but this loving thought,
'Had my friend's Muse grown with this growing age,
A dearer birth than this his love had brought
To march in ranks of better equipage:
  But since he died and poets better prove,
  Theirs for their style I'll read, his for his love'.


                   33
Full many a glorious morning have I seen,
Flatter the mountain tops with sovereign eye,
Kissing with golden face the meadows green;
Gilding pale streams with heavenly alchemy:
Anon permit the basest clouds to ride,
With ugly rack on his celestial face,
And from the forlorn world his visage hide
Stealing unseen to west with this disgrace:
Even so my sun one early morn did shine,
With all triumphant splendour on my brow,
But out alack, he was but one hour mine,
The region cloud hath masked him from me now.
  Yet him for this, my love no whit disdaineth,
  Suns of the world may stain, when heaven's sun staineth.


                   34
Why didst thou promise such a beauteous day,
And make me travel forth without my cloak,
To let base clouds o'ertake me in my way,
Hiding thy brav'ry in their rotten smoke?
'Tis not enough that through the cloud thou break,
To dry the rain on my storm-beaten face,
For no man well of such a salve can speak,
That heals the wound, and cures not the disgrace:
Nor can thy shame give physic to my grief,
Though thou repent, yet I have still the loss,
Th' offender's sorrow lends but weak relief
To him that bears the strong offence's cross.
  Ah but those tears are pearl which thy love sheds,
  And they are rich, and ransom all ill deeds.


                   35
No more be grieved at that which thou hast done,
Roses have thorns, and silver fountains mud,
Clouds and eclipses stain both moon and sun,
And loathsome canker lives in sweetest bud.
All men make faults, and even I in this,
Authorizing thy trespass with compare,
My self corrupting salving thy amiss,
Excusing thy sins more than thy sins are:
For to thy sensual fault I bring in sense,
Thy adverse party is thy advocate,
And 'gainst my self a lawful plea commence:
Such civil war is in my love and hate,
  That I an accessary needs must be,
  To that sweet thief which sourly robs from me.


                   36
Let me confess that we two must be twain,
Although our undivided loves are one:
So shall those blots that do with me remain,
Without thy help, by me be borne alone.
In our two loves there is but one respect,
Though in our lives a separable spite,
Which though it alter not love's sole effect,
Yet doth it steal sweet hours from love's delight.
I may not evermore acknowledge thee,
Lest my bewailed guilt should do thee shame,
Nor thou with public kindness honour me,
Unless thou take that honour from thy name:
  But do not so, I love thee in such sort,
  As thou being mine, mine is thy good report.


                   37
As a decrepit father takes delight,
To see his active child do deeds of youth,
So I, made lame by Fortune's dearest spite
Take all my comfort of thy worth and truth.
For whether beauty, birth, or wealth, or wit,
Or any of these all, or all, or more
Entitled in thy parts, do crowned sit,
I make my love engrafted to this store:
So then I am not lame, poor, nor despised,
Whilst that this shadow doth such substance give,
That I in thy abundance am sufficed,
And by a part of all thy glory live:
  Look what is best, that best I wish in thee,
  This wish I have, then ten times happy me.


                   38
How can my muse want subject to invent
While thou dost breathe that pour'st into my verse,
Thine own sweet argument, too excellent,
For every vulgar paper to rehearse?
O give thy self the thanks if aught in me,
Worthy perusal stand against thy sight,
For who's so dumb that cannot write to thee,
When thou thy self dost give invention light?
Be thou the tenth Muse, ten times more in worth
Than those old nine which rhymers invocate,
And he that calls on thee, let him bring forth
Eternal numbers to outlive long date.
  If my slight muse do please these curious days,
  The pain be mine, but thine shall be the praise.


                   39
O how thy worth with manners may I sing,
When thou art all the better part of me?
What can mine own praise to mine own self bring:
And what is't but mine own when I praise thee?
Even for this, let us divided live,
And our dear love lose name of single one,
That by this separation I may give:
That due to thee which thou deserv'st alone:
O absence what a torment wouldst thou prove,
Were it not thy sour leisure gave sweet leave,
To entertain the time with thoughts of love,
Which time and thoughts so sweetly doth deceive.
  And that thou teachest how to make one twain,
  By praising him here who doth hence remain.


                   40
Take all my loves, my love, yea take them all,
What hast thou then more than thou hadst before?
No love, my love, that thou mayst true love call,
All mine was thine, before thou hadst this more:
Then if for my love, thou my love receivest,
I cannot blame thee, for my love thou usest,
But yet be blamed, if thou thy self deceivest
By wilful taste of what thy self refusest.
I do forgive thy robbery gentle thief
Although thou steal thee all my poverty:
And yet love knows it is a greater grief
To bear greater wrong, than hate's known injury.
  Lascivious grace, in whom all ill well shows,
  Kill me with spites yet we must not be foes.


                   41
Those pretty wrongs that liberty commits,
When I am sometime absent from thy heart,
Thy beauty, and thy years full well befits,
For still temptation follows where thou art.
Gentle thou art, and therefore to be won,
Beauteous thou art, therefore to be assailed.
And when a woman woos, what woman's son,
Will sourly leave her till he have prevailed?
Ay me, but yet thou mightst my seat forbear,
And chide thy beauty, and thy straying youth,
Who lead thee in their riot even there
Where thou art forced to break a twofold truth:
  Hers by thy beauty tempting her to thee,
  Thine by thy beauty being false to me.


                   42
That thou hast her it is not all my grief,
And yet it may be said I loved her dearly,
That she hath thee is of my wailing chief,
A loss in love that touches me more nearly.
Loving offenders thus I will excuse ye,
Thou dost love her, because thou know'st I love her,
And for my sake even so doth she abuse me,
Suff'ring my friend for my sake to approve her.
If I lose thee, my loss is my love's gain,
And losing her, my friend hath found that loss,
Both find each other, and I lose both twain,
And both for my sake lay on me this cross,
  But here's the joy, my friend and I are one,
  Sweet flattery, then she loves but me alone.


                   43
When most I wink then do mine eyes best see,
For all the day they view things unrespected,
But when I sleep, in dreams they look on thee,
And darkly bright, are bright in dark directed.
Then thou whose shadow shadows doth make bright
How would thy shadow's form, form happy show,
To the clear day with thy much clearer light,
When to unseeing eyes thy shade shines so!
How would (I say) mine eyes be blessed made,
By looking on thee in the living day,
When in dead night thy fair imperfect shade,
Through heavy sleep on sightless eyes doth stay!
  All days are nights to see till I see thee,
  And nights bright days when dreams do show thee me.


                   44
If the dull substance of my flesh were thought,
Injurious distance should not stop my way,
For then despite of space I would be brought,
From limits far remote, where thou dost stay,
No matter then although my foot did stand
Upon the farthest earth removed from thee,
For nimble thought can jump both sea and land,
As soon as think the place where he would be.
But ah, thought kills me that I am not thought
To leap large lengths of miles when thou art gone,
But that so much of earth and water wrought,
I must attend, time's leisure with my moan.
  Receiving nought by elements so slow,
  But heavy tears, badges of either's woe.


                   45
The other two, slight air, and purging fire,
Are both with thee, wherever I abide,
The first my thought, the other my desire,
These present-absent with swift motion slide.
For when these quicker elements are gone
In tender embassy of love to thee,
My life being made of four, with two alone,
Sinks down to death, oppressed with melancholy.
Until life's composition be recured,
By those swift messengers returned from thee,
Who even but now come back again assured,
Of thy fair health, recounting it to me.
  This told, I joy, but then no longer glad,
  I send them back again and straight grow sad.


                   46
Mine eye and heart are at a mortal war,
How to divide the conquest of thy sight,
Mine eye, my heart thy picture's sight would bar,
My heart, mine eye the freedom of that right,
My heart doth plead that thou in him dost lie,
(A closet never pierced with crystal eyes)
But the defendant doth that plea deny,
And says in him thy fair appearance lies.
To side this title is impanelled
A quest of thoughts, all tenants to the heart,
And by their verdict is determined
The clear eye's moiety, and the dear heart's part.
  As thus, mine eye's due is thy outward part,
  And my heart's right, thy inward love of heart.


                   47
Betwixt mine eye and heart a league is took,
And each doth good turns now unto the other,
When that mine eye is famished for a look,
Or heart in love with sighs himself doth smother;
With my love's picture then my eye doth feast,
And to the painted banquet bids my heart:
Another time mine eye is my heart's guest,
And in his thoughts of love doth share a part.
So either by thy picture or my love,
Thy self away, art present still with me,
For thou not farther than my thoughts canst move,
And I am still with them, and they with thee.
  Or if they sleep, thy picture in my sight
  Awakes my heart, to heart's and eye's delight.


                   48
How careful was I when I took my way,
Each trifle under truest bars to thrust,
That to my use it might unused stay
From hands of falsehood, in sure wards of trust!
But thou, to whom my jewels trifles are,
Most worthy comfort, now my greatest grief,
Thou best of dearest, and mine only care,
Art left the prey of every vulgar thief.
Thee have I not locked up in any chest,
Save where thou art not, though I feel thou art,
Within the gentle closure of my breast,
From whence at pleasure thou mayst come and part,
  And even thence thou wilt be stol'n I fear,
  For truth proves thievish for a prize so dear.


                   49
Against that time (if ever that time come)
When I shall see thee frown on my defects,
When as thy love hath cast his utmost sum,
Called to that audit by advised respects,
Against that time when thou shalt strangely pass,
And scarcely greet me with that sun thine eye,
When love converted from the thing it was
Shall reasons find of settled gravity;
Against that time do I ensconce me here
Within the knowledge of mine own desert,
And this my hand, against my self uprear,
To guard the lawful reasons on thy part,
  To leave poor me, thou hast the strength of laws,
  Since why to love, I can allege no cause.


                   50
How heavy do I journey on the way,
When what I seek (my weary travel's end)
Doth teach that case and that repose to say
'Thus far the miles are measured from thy friend.'
The beast that bears me, tired with my woe,
Plods dully on, to bear that weight in me,
As if by some instinct the wretch did know
His rider loved not speed being made from thee:
The bloody spur cannot provoke him on,
That sometimes anger thrusts into his hide,
Which heavily he answers with a groan,
More sharp to me than spurring to his side,
  For that same groan doth put this in my mind,
  My grief lies onward and my joy behind.


                   51
Thus can my love excuse the slow offence,
Of my dull bearer, when from thee I speed,
From where thou art, why should I haste me thence?
Till I return of posting is no need.
O what excuse will my poor beast then find,
When swift extremity can seem but slow?
Then should I spur though mounted on the wind,
In winged speed no motion shall I know,
Then can no horse with my desire keep pace,
Therefore desire (of perfect'st love being made)
Shall neigh (no dull flesh) in his fiery race,
But love, for love, thus shall excuse my jade,
  Since from thee going, he went wilful-slow,
  Towards thee I'll run, and give him leave to go.


                   52
So am I as the rich whose blessed key,
Can bring him to his sweet up-locked treasure,
The which he will not every hour survey,
For blunting the fine point of seldom pleasure.
Therefore are feasts so solemn and so rare,
Since seldom coming in that long year set,
Like stones of worth they thinly placed are,
Or captain jewels in the carcanet.
So is the time that keeps you as my chest
Or as the wardrobe which the robe doth hide,
To make some special instant special-blest,
By new unfolding his imprisoned pride.
  Blessed are you whose worthiness gives scope,
  Being had to triumph, being lacked to hope.


                   53
What is your substance, whereof are you made,
That millions of strange shadows on you tend?
Since every one, hath every one, one shade,
And you but one, can every shadow lend:
Describe Adonis and the counterfeit,
Is poorly imitated after you,
On Helen's cheek all art of beauty set,
And you in Grecian tires are painted new:
Speak of the spring, and foison of the year,
The one doth shadow of your beauty show,
The other as your bounty doth appear,
And you in every blessed shape we know.
  In all external grace you have some part,
  But you like none, none you for constant heart.


                   54
O how much more doth beauty beauteous seem,
By that sweet ornament which truth doth give!
The rose looks fair, but fairer we it deem
For that sweet odour, which doth in it live:
The canker blooms have full as deep a dye,
As the perfumed tincture of the roses,
Hang on such thorns, and play as wantonly,
When summer's breath their masked buds discloses:
But for their virtue only is their show,
They live unwooed, and unrespected fade,
Die to themselves. Sweet roses do not so,
Of their sweet deaths, are sweetest odours made:
  And so of you, beauteous and lovely youth,
  When that shall fade, my verse distills your truth.


                   55
Not marble, nor the gilded monuments
Of princes shall outlive this powerful rhyme,
But you shall shine more bright in these contents
Than unswept stone, besmeared with sluttish time.
When wasteful war shall statues overturn,
And broils root out the work of masonry,
Nor Mars his sword, nor war's quick fire shall burn:
The living record of your memory.
'Gainst death, and all-oblivious enmity
Shall you pace forth, your praise shall still find room,
Even in the eyes of all posterity
That wear this world out to the ending doom.
  So till the judgment that your self arise,
  You live in this, and dwell in lovers' eyes.


                   56
Sweet love renew thy force, be it not said
Thy edge should blunter be than appetite,
Which but to-day by feeding is allayed,
To-morrow sharpened in his former might.
So love be thou, although to-day thou fill
Thy hungry eyes, even till they wink with fulness,
To-morrow see again, and do not kill
The spirit of love, with a perpetual dulness:
Let this sad interim like the ocean be
Which parts the shore, where two contracted new,
Come daily to the banks, that when they see:
Return of love, more blest may be the view.
  Or call it winter, which being full of care,
  Makes summer's welcome, thrice more wished, more rare.


                   57
Being your slave what should I do but tend,
Upon the hours, and times of your desire?
I have no precious time at all to spend;
Nor services to do till you require.
Nor dare I chide the world-without-end hour,
Whilst I (my sovereign) watch the clock for you,
Nor think the bitterness of absence sour,
When you have bid your servant once adieu.
Nor dare I question with my jealous thought,
Where you may be, or your affairs suppose,
But like a sad slave stay and think of nought
Save where you are, how happy you make those.
  So true a fool is love, that in your will,
  (Though you do any thing) he thinks no ill.


                   58
That god forbid, that made me first your slave,
I should in thought control your times of pleasure,
Or at your hand th' account of hours to crave,
Being your vassal bound to stay your leisure.
O let me suffer (being at your beck)
Th' imprisoned absence of your liberty,
And patience tame to sufferance bide each check,
Without accusing you of injury.
Be where you list, your charter is so strong,
That you your self may privilage your time
To what you will, to you it doth belong,
Your self to pardon of self-doing crime.
  I am to wait, though waiting so be hell,
  Not blame your pleasure be it ill or well.


                   59
If there be nothing new, but that which is,
Hath been before, how are our brains beguiled,
Which labouring for invention bear amis
The second burthen of a former child!
O that record could with a backward look,
Even of five hundred courses of the sun,
Show me your image in some antique book,
Since mind at first in character was done.
That I might see what the old world could say,
To this composed wonder of your frame,
Whether we are mended, or whether better they,
Or whether revolution be the same.
  O sure I am the wits of former days,
  To subjects worse have given admiring praise.


                   60
Like as the waves make towards the pebbled shore,
So do our minutes hasten to their end,
Each changing place with that which goes before,
In sequent toil all forwards do contend.
Nativity once in the main of light,
Crawls to maturity, wherewith being crowned,
Crooked eclipses 'gainst his glory fight,
And Time that gave, doth now his gift confound.
Time doth transfix the flourish set on youth,
And delves the parallels in beauty's brow,
Feeds on the rarities of nature's truth,
And nothing stands but for his scythe to mow.
  And yet to times in hope, my verse shall stand
  Praising thy worth, despite his cruel hand.


                   61
Is it thy will, thy image should keep open
My heavy eyelids to the weary night?
Dost thou desire my slumbers should be broken,
While shadows like to thee do mock my sight?
Is it thy spirit that thou send'st from thee
So far from home into my deeds to pry,
To find out shames and idle hours in me,
The scope and tenure of thy jealousy?
O no, thy love though much, is not so great,
It is my love that keeps mine eye awake,
Mine own true love that doth my rest defeat,
To play the watchman ever for thy sake.
  For thee watch I, whilst thou dost wake elsewhere,
  From me far off, with others all too near.


                   62
Sin of self-love possesseth all mine eye,
And all my soul, and all my every part;
And for this sin there is no remedy,
It is so grounded inward in my heart.
Methinks no face so gracious is as mine,
No shape so true, no truth of such account,
And for my self mine own worth do define,
As I all other in all worths surmount.
But when my glass shows me my self indeed
beated and chopt with tanned antiquity,
Mine own self-love quite contrary I read:
Self, so self-loving were iniquity.
  'Tis thee (my self) that for my self I praise,
  Painting my age with beauty of thy days.


                   63
Against my love shall be as I am now
With Time's injurious hand crushed and o'erworn,
When hours have drained his blood and filled his brow
With lines and wrinkles, when his youthful morn
Hath travelled on to age's steepy night,
And all those beauties whereof now he's king
Are vanishing, or vanished out of sight,
Stealing away the treasure of his spring:
For such a time do I now fortify
Against confounding age's cruel knife,
That he shall never cut from memory
My sweet love's beauty, though my lover's life.
  His beauty shall in these black lines be seen,
  And they shall live, and he in them still green.


                   64
When I have seen by Time's fell hand defaced
The rich-proud cost of outworn buried age,
When sometime lofty towers I see down-rased,
And brass eternal slave to mortal rage.
When I have seen the hungry ocean gain
Advantage on the kingdom of the shore,
And the firm soil win of the watery main,
Increasing store with loss, and loss with store.
When I have seen such interchange of State,
Or state it self confounded, to decay,
Ruin hath taught me thus to ruminate
That Time will come and take my love away.
  This thought is as a death which cannot choose
  But weep to have, that which it fears to lose.


                   65
Since brass, nor stone, nor earth, nor boundless sea,
But sad mortality o'ersways their power,
How with this rage shall beauty hold a plea,
Whose action is no stronger than a flower?
O how shall summer's honey breath hold out,
Against the wrackful siege of batt'ring days,
When rocks impregnable are not so stout,
Nor gates of steel so strong but time decays?
O fearful meditation, where alack,
Shall Time's best jewel from Time's chest lie hid?
Or what strong hand can hold his swift foot back,
Or who his spoil of beauty can forbid?
  O none, unless this miracle have might,
  That in black ink my love may still shine bright.


                   66
Tired with all these for restful death I cry,
As to behold desert a beggar born,
And needy nothing trimmed in jollity,
And purest faith unhappily forsworn,
And gilded honour shamefully misplaced,
And maiden virtue rudely strumpeted,
And right perfection wrongfully disgraced,
And strength by limping sway disabled
And art made tongue-tied by authority,
And folly (doctor-like) controlling skill,
And simple truth miscalled simplicity,
And captive good attending captain ill.
  Tired with all these, from these would I be gone,
  Save that to die, I leave my love alone.


                   67
Ah wherefore with infection should he live,
And with his presence grace impiety,
That sin by him advantage should achieve,
And lace it self with his society?
Why should false painting imitate his cheek,
And steal dead seeming of his living hue?
Why should poor beauty indirectly seek,
Roses of shadow, since his rose is true?
Why should he live, now nature bankrupt is,
Beggared of blood to blush through lively veins,
For she hath no exchequer now but his,
And proud of many, lives upon his gains?
  O him she stores, to show what wealth she had,
  In days long since, before these last so bad.


                   68
Thus is his cheek the map of days outworn,
When beauty lived and died as flowers do now,
Before these bastard signs of fair were born,
Or durst inhabit on a living brow:
Before the golden tresses of the dead,
The right of sepulchres, were shorn away,
To live a second life on second head,
Ere beauty's dead fleece made another gay:
In him those holy antique hours are seen,
Without all ornament, it self and true,
Making no summer of another's green,
Robbing no old to dress his beauty new,
  And him as for a map doth Nature store,
  To show false Art what beauty was of yore.


                   69
Those parts of thee that the world's eye doth view,
Want nothing that the thought of hearts can mend:
All tongues (the voice of souls) give thee that due,
Uttering bare truth, even so as foes commend.
Thy outward thus with outward praise is crowned,
But those same tongues that give thee so thine own,
In other accents do this praise confound
By seeing farther than the eye hath shown.
They look into the beauty of thy mind,
And that in guess they measure by thy deeds,
Then churls their thoughts (although their eyes were kind)
To thy fair flower add the rank smell of weeds:
  But why thy odour matcheth not thy show,
  The soil is this, that thou dost common grow.


                   70
That thou art blamed shall not be thy defect,
For slander's mark was ever yet the fair,
The ornament of beauty is suspect,
A crow that flies in heaven's sweetest air.
So thou be good, slander doth but approve,
Thy worth the greater being wooed of time,
For canker vice the sweetest buds doth love,
And thou present'st a pure unstained prime.
Thou hast passed by the ambush of young days,
Either not assailed, or victor being charged,
Yet this thy praise cannot be so thy praise,
To tie up envy, evermore enlarged,
  If some suspect of ill masked not thy show,
  Then thou alone kingdoms of hearts shouldst owe.


                   71
No longer mourn for me when I am dead,
Than you shall hear the surly sullen bell
Give warning to the world that I am fled
From this vile world with vilest worms to dwell:
Nay if you read this line, remember not,
The hand that writ it, for I love you so,
That I in your sweet thoughts would be forgot,
If thinking on me then should make you woe.
O if (I say) you look upon this verse,
When I (perhaps) compounded am with clay,
Do not so much as my poor name rehearse;
But let your love even with my life decay.
  Lest the wise world should look into your moan,
  And mock you with me after I am gone.


                   72
O lest the world should task you to recite,
What merit lived in me that you should love
After my death (dear love) forget me quite,
For you in me can nothing worthy prove.
Unless you would devise some virtuous lie,
To do more for me than mine own desert,
And hang more praise upon deceased I,
Than niggard truth would willingly impart:
O lest your true love may seem false in this,
That you for love speak well of me untrue,
My name be buried where my body is,
And live no more to shame nor me, nor you.
  For I am shamed by that which I bring forth,
  And so should you, to love things nothing worth.


                   73
That time of year thou mayst in me behold,
When yellow leaves, or none, or few do hang
Upon those boughs which shake against the cold,
Bare ruined choirs, where late the sweet birds sang.
In me thou seest the twilight of such day,
As after sunset fadeth in the west,
Which by and by black night doth take away,
Death's second self that seals up all in rest.
In me thou seest the glowing of such fire,
That on the ashes of his youth doth lie,
As the death-bed, whereon it must expire,
Consumed with that which it was nourished by.
  This thou perceiv'st, which makes thy love more strong,
  To love that well, which thou must leave ere long.


                   74
But be contented when that fell arrest,
Without all bail shall carry me away,
My life hath in this line some interest,
Which for memorial still with thee shall stay.
When thou reviewest this, thou dost review,
The very part was consecrate to thee,
The earth can have but earth, which is his due,
My spirit is thine the better part of me,
So then thou hast but lost the dregs of life,
The prey of worms, my body being dead,
The coward conquest of a wretch's knife,
Too base of thee to be remembered,
  The worth of that, is that which it contains,
  And that is this, and this with thee remains.


                   75
So are you to my thoughts as food to life,
Or as sweet-seasoned showers are to the ground;
And for the peace of you I hold such strife
As 'twixt a miser and his wealth is found.
Now proud as an enjoyer, and anon
Doubting the filching age will steal his treasure,
Now counting best to be with you alone,
Then bettered that the world may see my pleasure,
Sometime all full with feasting on your sight,
And by and by clean starved for a look,
Possessing or pursuing no delight
Save what is had, or must from you be took.
  Thus do I pine and surfeit day by day,
  Or gluttoning on all, or all away.


                   76
Why is my verse so barren of new pride?
So far from variation or quick change?
Why with the time do I not glance aside
To new-found methods, and to compounds strange?
Why write I still all one, ever the same,
And keep invention in a noted weed,
That every word doth almost tell my name,
Showing their birth, and where they did proceed?
O know sweet love I always write of you,
And you and love are still my argument:
So all my best is dressing old words new,
Spending again what is already spent:
  For as the sun is daily new and old,
  So is my love still telling what is told.


                   77
Thy glass will show thee how thy beauties wear,
Thy dial how thy precious minutes waste,
These vacant leaves thy mind's imprint will bear,
And of this book, this learning mayst thou taste.
The wrinkles which thy glass will truly show,
Of mouthed graves will give thee memory,
Thou by thy dial's shady stealth mayst know,
Time's thievish progress to eternity.
Look what thy memory cannot contain,
Commit to these waste blanks, and thou shalt find
Those children nursed, delivered from thy brain,
To take a new acquaintance of thy mind.
  These offices, so oft as thou wilt look,
  Shall profit thee, and much enrich thy book.


                   78
So oft have I invoked thee for my muse,
And found such fair assistance in my verse,
As every alien pen hath got my use,
And under thee their poesy disperse.
Thine eyes, that taught the dumb on high to sing,
And heavy ignorance aloft to fly,
Have added feathers to the learned's wing,
And given grace a double majesty.
Yet be most proud of that which I compile,
Whose influence is thine, and born of thee,
In others' works thou dost but mend the style,
And arts with thy sweet graces graced be.
  But thou art all my art, and dost advance
  As high as learning, my rude ignorance.


                   79
Whilst I alone did call upon thy aid,
My verse alone had all thy gentle grace,
But now my gracious numbers are decayed,
And my sick muse doth give an other place.
I grant (sweet love) thy lovely argument
Deserves the travail of a worthier pen,
Yet what of thee thy poet doth invent,
He robs thee of, and pays it thee again,
He lends thee virtue, and he stole that word,
From thy behaviour, beauty doth he give
And found it in thy cheek: he can afford
No praise to thee, but what in thee doth live.
  Then thank him not for that which he doth say,
  Since what he owes thee, thou thy self dost pay.


                   80
O how I faint when I of you do write,
Knowing a better spirit doth use your name,
And in the praise thereof spends all his might,
To make me tongue-tied speaking of your fame.
But since your worth (wide as the ocean is)
The humble as the proudest sail doth bear,
My saucy bark (inferior far to his)
On your broad main doth wilfully appear.
Your shallowest help will hold me up afloat,
Whilst he upon your soundless deep doth ride,
Or (being wrecked) I am a worthless boat,
He of tall building, and of goodly pride.
  Then if he thrive and I be cast away,
  The worst was this, my love was my decay.


                   81
Or I shall live your epitaph to make,
Or you survive when I in earth am rotten,
From hence your memory death cannot take,
Although in me each part will be forgotten.
Your name from hence immortal life shall have,
Though I (once gone) to all the world must die,
The earth can yield me but a common grave,
When you entombed in men's eyes shall lie,
Your monument shall be my gentle verse,
Which eyes not yet created shall o'er-read,
And tongues to be, your being shall rehearse,
When all the breathers of this world are dead,
  You still shall live (such virtue hath my pen)
  Where breath most breathes, even in the mouths of men.


                   82
I grant thou wert not married to my muse,
And therefore mayst without attaint o'erlook
The dedicated words which writers use
Of their fair subject, blessing every book.
Thou art as fair in knowledge as in hue,
Finding thy worth a limit past my praise,
And therefore art enforced to seek anew,
Some fresher stamp of the time-bettering days.
And do so love, yet when they have devised,
What strained touches rhetoric can lend,
Thou truly fair, wert truly sympathized,
In true plain words, by thy true-telling friend.
  And their gross painting might be better used,
  Where cheeks need blood, in thee it is abused.


                   83
I never saw that you did painting need,
And therefore to your fair no painting set,
I found (or thought I found) you did exceed,
That barren tender of a poet's debt:
And therefore have I slept in your report,
That you your self being extant well might show,
How far a modern quill doth come too short,
Speaking of worth, what worth in you doth grow.
This silence for my sin you did impute,
Which shall be most my glory being dumb,
For I impair not beauty being mute,
When others would give life, and bring a tomb.
  There lives more life in one of your fair eyes,
  Than both your poets can in praise devise.


                   84
Who is it that says most, which can say more,
Than this rich praise, that you alone, are you?
In whose confine immured is the store,
Which should example where your equal grew.
Lean penury within that pen doth dwell,
That to his subject lends not some small glory,
But he that writes of you, if he can tell,
That you are you, so dignifies his story.
Let him but copy what in you is writ,
Not making worse what nature made so clear,
And such a counterpart shall fame his wit,
Making his style admired every where.
  You to your beauteous blessings add a curse,
  Being fond on praise, which makes your praises worse.


                   85
My tongue-tied muse in manners holds her still,
While comments of your praise richly compiled,
Reserve their character with golden quill,
And precious phrase by all the Muses filed.
I think good thoughts, whilst other write good words,
And like unlettered clerk still cry Amen,
To every hymn that able spirit affords,
In polished form of well refined pen.
Hearing you praised, I say 'tis so, 'tis true,
And to the most of praise add something more,
But that is in my thought, whose love to you
(Though words come hindmost) holds his rank before,
  Then others, for the breath of words respect,
  Me for my dumb thoughts, speaking in effect.


                   86
Was it the proud full sail of his great verse,
Bound for the prize of (all too precious) you,
That did my ripe thoughts in my brain inhearse,
Making their tomb the womb wherein they grew?
Was it his spirit, by spirits taught to write,
Above a mortal pitch, that struck me dead?
No, neither he, nor his compeers by night
Giving him aid, my verse astonished.
He nor that affable familiar ghost
Which nightly gulls him with intelligence,
As victors of my silence cannot boast,
I was not sick of any fear from thence.
  But when your countenance filled up his line,
  Then lacked I matter, that enfeebled mine.


                   87
Farewell! thou art too dear for my possessing,
And like enough thou know'st thy estimate,
The charter of thy worth gives thee releasing:
My bonds in thee are all determinate.
For how do I hold thee but by thy granting,
And for that riches where is my deserving?
The cause of this fair gift in me is wanting,
And so my patent back again is swerving.
Thy self thou gav'st, thy own worth then not knowing,
Or me to whom thou gav'st it, else mistaking,
So thy great gift upon misprision growing,
Comes home again, on better judgement making.
  Thus have I had thee as a dream doth flatter,
  In sleep a king, but waking no such matter.


                   88
When thou shalt be disposed to set me light,
And place my merit in the eye of scorn,
Upon thy side, against my self I'll fight,
And prove thee virtuous, though thou art forsworn:
With mine own weakness being best acquainted,
Upon thy part I can set down a story
Of faults concealed, wherein I am attainted:
That thou in losing me, shalt win much glory:
And I by this will be a gainer too,
For bending all my loving thoughts on thee,
The injuries that to my self I do,
Doing thee vantage, double-vantage me.
  Such is my love, to thee I so belong,
  That for thy right, my self will bear all wrong.


                   89
Say that thou didst forsake me for some fault,
And I will comment upon that offence,
Speak of my lameness, and I straight will halt:
Against thy reasons making no defence.
Thou canst not (love) disgrace me half so ill,
To set a form upon desired change,
As I'll my self disgrace, knowing thy will,
I will acquaintance strangle and look strange:
Be absent from thy walks and in my tongue,
Thy sweet beloved name no more shall dwell,
Lest I (too much profane) should do it wronk:
And haply of our old acquaintance tell.
  For thee, against my self I'll vow debate,
  For I must ne'er love him whom thou dost hate.


                   90
Then hate me when thou wilt, if ever, now,
Now while the world is bent my deeds to cross,
join with the spite of fortune, make me bow,
And do not drop in for an after-loss:
Ah do not, when my heart hath 'scaped this sorrow,
Come in the rearward of a conquered woe,
Give not a windy night a rainy morrow,
To linger out a purposed overthrow.
If thou wilt leave me, do not leave me last,
When other petty griefs have done their spite,
But in the onset come, so shall I taste
At first the very worst of fortune's might.
  And other strains of woe, which now seem woe,
  Compared with loss of thee, will not seem so.


                   91
Some glory in their birth, some in their skill,
Some in their wealth, some in their body's force,
Some in their garments though new-fangled ill:
Some in their hawks and hounds, some in their horse.
And every humour hath his adjunct pleasure,
Wherein it finds a joy above the rest,
But these particulars are not my measure,
All these I better in one general best.
Thy love is better than high birth to me,
Richer than wealth, prouder than garments' costs,
Of more delight than hawks and horses be:
And having thee, of all men's pride I boast.
  Wretched in this alone, that thou mayst take,
  All this away, and me most wretchcd make.


                   92
But do thy worst to steal thy self away,
For term of life thou art assured mine,
And life no longer than thy love will stay,
For it depends upon that love of thine.
Then need I not to fear the worst of wrongs,
When in the least of them my life hath end,
I see, a better state to me belongs
Than that, which on thy humour doth depend.
Thou canst not vex me with inconstant mind,
Since that my life on thy revolt doth lie,
O what a happy title do I find,
Happy to have thy love, happy to die!
  But what's so blessed-fair that fears no blot?
  Thou mayst be false, and yet I know it not.


                   93
So shall I live, supposing thou art true,
Like a deceived husband, so love's face,
May still seem love to me, though altered new:
Thy looks with me, thy heart in other place.
For there can live no hatred in thine eye,
Therefore in that I cannot know thy change,
In many's looks, the false heart's history
Is writ in moods and frowns and wrinkles strange.
But heaven in thy creation did decree,
That in thy face sweet love should ever dwell,
Whate'er thy thoughts, or thy heart's workings be,
Thy looks should nothing thence, but sweetness tell.
  How like Eve's apple doth thy beauty grow,
  If thy sweet virtue answer not thy show.


                   94
They that have power to hurt, and will do none,
That do not do the thing, they most do show,
Who moving others, are themselves as stone,
Unmoved, cold, and to temptation slow:
They rightly do inherit heaven's graces,
And husband nature's riches from expense,
Tibey are the lords and owners of their faces,
Others, but stewards of their excellence:
The summer's flower is to the summer sweet,
Though to it self, it only live and die,
But if that flower with base infection meet,
The basest weed outbraves his dignity:
  For sweetest things turn sourest by their deeds,
  Lilies that fester, smell far worse than weeds.


                   95
How sweet and lovely dost thou make the shame,
Which like a canker in the fragrant rose,
Doth spot the beauty of thy budding name!
O in what sweets dost thou thy sins enclose!
That tongue that tells the story of thy days,
(Making lascivious comments on thy sport)
Cannot dispraise, but in a kind of praise,
Naming thy name, blesses an ill report.
O what a mansion have those vices got,
Which for their habitation chose out thee,
Where beauty's veil doth cover every blot,
And all things turns to fair, that eyes can see!
  Take heed (dear heart) of this large privilege,
  The hardest knife ill-used doth lose his edge.


                   96
Some say thy fault is youth, some wantonness,
Some say thy grace is youth and gentle sport,
Both grace and faults are loved of more and less:
Thou mak'st faults graces, that to thee resort:
As on the finger of a throned queen,
The basest jewel will be well esteemed:
So are those errors that in thee are seen,
To truths translated, and for true things deemed.
How many lambs might the stern wolf betray,
If like a lamb he could his looks translate!
How many gazers mightst thou lead away,
if thou wouldst use the strength of all thy state!
  But do not so, I love thee in such sort,
  As thou being mine, mine is thy good report.


                   97
How like a winter hath my absence been
From thee, the pleasure of the fleeting year!
What freezings have I felt, what dark days seen!
What old December's bareness everywhere!
And yet this time removed was summer's time,
The teeming autumn big with rich increase,
Bearing the wanton burden of the prime,
Like widowed wombs after their lords' decease:
Yet this abundant issue seemed to me
But hope of orphans, and unfathered fruit,
For summer and his pleasures wait on thee,
And thou away, the very birds are mute.
  Or if they sing, 'tis with so dull a cheer,
  That leaves look pale, dreading the winter's near.


                   98
From you have I been absent in the spring,
When proud-pied April (dressed in all his trim)
Hath put a spirit of youth in every thing:
That heavy Saturn laughed and leaped with him.
Yet nor the lays of birds, nor the sweet smell
Of different flowers in odour and in hue,
Could make me any summer's story tell:
Or from their proud lap pluck them where they grew:
Nor did I wonder at the lily's white,
Nor praise the deep vermilion in the rose,
They were but sweet, but figures of delight:
Drawn after you, you pattern of all those.
  Yet seemed it winter still, and you away,
  As with your shadow I with these did play.


                   99
The forward violet thus did I chide,
Sweet thief, whence didst thou steal thy sweet that smells,
If not from my love's breath? The purple pride
Which on thy soft check for complexion dwells,
In my love's veins thou hast too grossly dyed.
The lily I condemned for thy hand,
And buds of marjoram had stol'n thy hair,
The roses fearfully on thorns did stand,
One blushing shame, another white despair:
A third nor red, nor white, had stol'n of both,
And to his robbery had annexed thy breath,
But for his theft in pride of all his growth
A vengeful canker eat him up to death.
  More flowers I noted, yet I none could see,
  But sweet, or colour it had stol'n from thee.


                   100
Where art thou Muse that thou forget'st so long,
To speak of that which gives thee all thy might?
Spend'st thou thy fury on some worthless song,
Darkening thy power to lend base subjects light?
Return forgetful Muse, and straight redeem,
In gentle numbers time so idly spent,
Sing to the ear that doth thy lays esteem,
And gives thy pen both skill and argument.
Rise resty Muse, my love's sweet face survey,
If time have any wrinkle graven there,
If any, be a satire to decay,
And make time's spoils despised everywhere.
  Give my love fame faster than Time wastes life,
  So thou prevent'st his scythe, and crooked knife.


                   101
O truant Muse what shall be thy amends,
For thy neglect of truth in beauty dyed?
Both truth and beauty on my love depends:
So dost thou too, and therein dignified:
Make answer Muse, wilt thou not haply say,
'Truth needs no colour with his colour fixed,
Beauty no pencil, beauty's truth to lay:
But best is best, if never intermixed'?
Because he needs no praise, wilt thou be dumb?
Excuse not silence so, for't lies in thee,
To make him much outlive a gilded tomb:
And to be praised of ages yet to be.
  Then do thy office Muse, I teach thee how,
  To make him seem long hence, as he shows now.


                   102
My love is strengthened though more weak in seeming,
I love not less, though less the show appear,
That love is merchandized, whose rich esteeming,
The owner's tongue doth publish every where.
Our love was new, and then but in the spring,
When I was wont to greet it with my lays,
As Philomel in summer's front doth sing,
And stops her pipe in growth of riper days:
Not that the summer is less pleasant now
Than when her mournful hymns did hush the night,
But that wild music burthens every bough,
And sweets grown common lose their dear delight.
  Therefore like her, I sometime hold my tongue:
  Because I would not dull you with my song.


                   103
Alack what poverty my muse brings forth,
That having such a scope to show her pride,
The argument all bare is of more worth
Than when it hath my added praise beside.
O blame me not if I no more can write!
Look in your glass and there appears a face,
That over-goes my blunt invention quite,
Dulling my lines, and doing me disgrace.
Were it not sinful then striving to mend,
To mar the subject that before was well?
For to no other pass my verses tend,
Than of your graces and your gifts to tell.
  And more, much more than in my verse can sit,
  Your own glass shows you, when you look in it.


                   104
To me fair friend you never can be old,
For as you were when first your eye I eyed,
Such seems your beauty still: three winters cold,
Have from the forests shook three summers' pride,
Three beauteous springs to yellow autumn turned,
In process of the seasons have I seen,
Three April perfumes in three hot Junes burned,
Since first I saw you fresh which yet are green.
Ah yet doth beauty like a dial hand,
Steal from his figure, and no pace perceived,
So your sweet hue, which methinks still doth stand
Hath motion, and mine eye may be deceived.
  For fear of which, hear this thou age unbred,
  Ere you were born was beauty's summer dead.


                   105
Let not my love be called idolatry,
Nor my beloved as an idol show,
Since all alike my songs and praises be
To one, of one, still such, and ever so.
Kind is my love to-day, to-morrow kind,
Still constant in a wondrous excellence,
Therefore my verse to constancy confined,
One thing expressing, leaves out difference.
Fair, kind, and true, is all my argument,
Fair, kind, and true, varying to other words,
And in this change is my invention spent,
Three themes in one, which wondrous scope affords.
  Fair, kind, and true, have often lived alone.
  Which three till now, never kept seat in one.


                   106
When in the chronicle of wasted time,
I see descriptions of the fairest wights,
And beauty making beautiful old rhyme,
In praise of ladies dead, and lovely knights,
Then in the blazon of sweet beauty's best,
Of hand, of foot, of lip, of eye, of brow,
I see their antique pen would have expressed,
Even such a beauty as you master now.
So all their praises are but prophecies
Of this our time, all you prefiguring,
And for they looked but with divining eyes,
They had not skill enough your worth to sing:
  For we which now behold these present days,
  Have eyes to wonder, but lack tongues to praise.


                   107
Not mine own fears, nor the prophetic soul,
Of the wide world, dreaming on things to come,
Can yet the lease of my true love control,
Supposed as forfeit to a confined doom.
The mortal moon hath her eclipse endured,
And the sad augurs mock their own presage,
Incertainties now crown themselves assured,
And peace proclaims olives of endless age.
Now with the drops of this most balmy time,
My love looks fresh, and death to me subscribes,
Since spite of him I'll live in this poor rhyme,
While he insults o'er dull and speechless tribes.
  And thou in this shalt find thy monument,
  When tyrants' crests and tombs of brass are spent.


                   108
What's in the brain that ink may character,
Which hath not figured to thee my true spirit,
What's new to speak, what now to register,
That may express my love, or thy dear merit?
Nothing sweet boy, but yet like prayers divine,
I must each day say o'er the very same,
Counting no old thing old, thou mine, I thine,
Even as when first I hallowed thy fair name.
So that eternal love in love's fresh case,
Weighs not the dust and injury of age,
Nor gives to necessary wrinkles place,
But makes antiquity for aye his page,
  Finding the first conceit of love there bred,
  Where time and outward form would show it dead.


                   109
O never say that I was false of heart,
Though absence seemed my flame to qualify,
As easy might I from my self depart,
As from my soul which in thy breast doth lie:
That is my home of love, if I have ranged,
Like him that travels I return again,
Just to the time, not with the time exchanged,
So that my self bring water for my stain,
Never believe though in my nature reigned,
All frailties that besiege all kinds of blood,
That it could so preposterously be stained,
To leave for nothing all thy sum of good:
  For nothing this wide universe I call,
  Save thou my rose, in it thou art my all.


                   110
Alas 'tis true, I have gone here and there,
And made my self a motley to the view,
Gored mine own thoughts, sold cheap what is most dear,
Made old offences of affections new.
Most true it is, that I have looked on truth
Askance and strangely: but by all above,
These blenches gave my heart another youth,
And worse essays proved thee my best of love.
Now all is done, have what shall have no end,
Mine appetite I never more will grind
On newer proof, to try an older friend,
A god in love, to whom I am confined.
  Then give me welcome, next my heaven the best,
  Even to thy pure and most most loving breast.


                   111
O for my sake do you with Fortune chide,
The guilty goddess of my harmful deeds,
That did not better for my life provide,
Than public means which public manners breeds.
Thence comes it that my name receives a brand,
And almost thence my nature is subdued
To what it works in, like the dyer's hand:
Pity me then, and wish I were renewed,
Whilst like a willing patient I will drink,
Potions of eisel 'gainst my strong infection,
No bitterness that I will bitter think,
Nor double penance to correct correction.
  Pity me then dear friend, and I assure ye,
  Even that your pity is enough to cure me.


                   112
Your love and pity doth th' impression fill,
Which vulgar scandal stamped upon my brow,
For what care I who calls me well or ill,
So you o'er-green my bad, my good allow?
You are my all the world, and I must strive,
To know my shames and praises from your tongue,
None else to me, nor I to none alive,
That my steeled sense or changes right or wrong.
In so profound abysm I throw all care
Of others' voices, that my adder's sense,
To critic and to flatterer stopped are:
Mark how with my neglect I do dispense.
  You are so strongly in my purpose bred,
  That all the world besides methinks are dead.


                   113
Since I left you, mine eye is in my mind,
And that which governs me to go about,
Doth part his function, and is partly blind,
Seems seeing, but effectually is out:
For it no form delivers to the heart
Of bird, of flower, or shape which it doth latch,
Of his quick objects hath the mind no part,
Nor his own vision holds what it doth catch:
For if it see the rud'st or gentlest sight,
The most sweet favour or deformed'st creature,
The mountain, or the sea, the day, or night:
The crow, or dove, it shapes them to your feature.
  Incapable of more, replete with you,
  My most true mind thus maketh mine untrue.


                   114
Or whether doth my mind being crowned with you
Drink up the monarch's plague this flattery?
Or whether shall I say mine eye saith true,
And that your love taught it this alchemy?
To make of monsters, and things indigest,
Such cherubins as your sweet self resemble,
Creating every bad a perfect best
As fast as objects to his beams assemble:
O 'tis the first, 'tis flattery in my seeing,
And my great mind most kingly drinks it up,
Mine eye well knows what with his gust is 'greeing,
And to his palate doth prepare the cup.
  If it be poisoned, 'tis the lesser sin,
  That mine eye loves it and doth first begin.


                   115
Those lines that I before have writ do lie,
Even those that said I could not love you dearer,
Yet then my judgment knew no reason why,
My most full flame should afterwards burn clearer,
But reckoning time, whose millioned accidents
Creep in 'twixt vows, and change decrees of kings,
Tan sacred beauty, blunt the sharp'st intents,
Divert strong minds to the course of alt'ring things:
Alas why fearing of time's tyranny,
Might I not then say 'Now I love you best,'
When I was certain o'er incertainty,
Crowning the present, doubting of the rest?
  Love is a babe, then might I not say so
  To give full growth to that which still doth grow.


                   116
Let me not to the marriage of true minds
Admit impediments, love is not love
Which alters when it alteration finds,
Or bends with the remover to remove.
O no, it is an ever-fixed mark
That looks on tempests and is never shaken;
It is the star to every wand'ring bark,
Whose worth's unknown, although his height be taken.
Love's not Time's fool, though rosy lips and cheeks
Within his bending sickle's compass come,
Love alters not with his brief hours and weeks,
But bears it out even to the edge of doom:
  If this be error and upon me proved,
  I never writ, nor no man ever loved.


                   117
Accuse me thus, that I have scanted all,
Wherein I should your great deserts repay,
Forgot upon your dearest love to call,
Whereto all bonds do tie me day by day,
That I have frequent been with unknown minds,
And given to time your own dear-purchased right,
That I have hoisted sail to all the winds
Which should transport me farthest from your sight.
Book both my wilfulness and errors down,
And on just proof surmise, accumulate,
Bring me within the level of your frown,
But shoot not at me in your wakened hate:
  Since my appeal says I did strive to prove
  The constancy and virtue of your love.


                   118
Like as to make our appetite more keen
With eager compounds we our palate urge,
As to prevent our maladies unseen,
We sicken to shun sickness when we purge.
Even so being full of your ne'er-cloying sweetness,
To bitter sauces did I frame my feeding;
And sick of welfare found a kind of meetness,
To be diseased ere that there was true needing.
Thus policy in love t' anticipate
The ills that were not, grew to faults assured,
And brought to medicine a healthful state
Which rank of goodness would by ill be cured.
  But thence I learn and find the lesson true,
  Drugs poison him that so feil sick of you.


                   119
What potions have I drunk of Siren tears
Distilled from limbecks foul as hell within,
Applying fears to hopes, and hopes to fears,
Still losing when I saw my self to win!
What wretched errors hath my heart committed,
Whilst it hath thought it self so blessed never!
How have mine eyes out of their spheres been fitted
In the distraction of this madding fever!
O benefit of ill, now I find true
That better is, by evil still made better.
And ruined love when it is built anew
Grows fairer than at first, more strong, far greater.
  So I return rebuked to my content,
  And gain by ills thrice more than I have spent.


                   120
That you were once unkind befriends me now,
And for that sorrow, which I then did feel,
Needs must I under my transgression bow,
Unless my nerves were brass or hammered steel.
For if you were by my unkindness shaken
As I by yours, y'have passed a hell of time,
And I a tyrant have no leisure taken
To weigh how once I suffered in your crime.
O that our night of woe might have remembered
My deepest sense, how hard true sorrow hits,
And soon to you, as you to me then tendered
The humble salve, which wounded bosoms fits!
  But that your trespass now becomes a fee,
  Mine ransoms yours, and yours must ransom me.


                   121
'Tis better to be vile than vile esteemed,
When not to be, receives reproach of being,
And the just pleasure lost, which is so deemed,
Not by our feeling, but by others' seeing.
For why should others' false adulterate eyes
Give salutation to my sportive blood?
Or on my frailties why are frailer spies,
Which in their wills count bad what I think good?
No, I am that I am, and they that level
At my abuses, reckon up their own,
I may be straight though they themselves be bevel;
By their rank thoughts, my deeds must not be shown
  Unless this general evil they maintain,
  All men are bad and in their badness reign.


                   122
Thy gift, thy tables, are within my brain
Full charactered with lasting memory,
Which shall above that idle rank remain
Beyond all date even to eternity.
Or at the least, so long as brain and heart
Have faculty by nature to subsist,
Till each to razed oblivion yield his part
Of thee, thy record never can be missed:
That poor retention could not so much hold,
Nor need I tallies thy dear love to score,
Therefore to give them from me was I bold,
To trust those tables that receive thee more:
  To keep an adjunct to remember thee
  Were to import forgetfulness in me.


                   123
No! Time, thou shalt not boast that I do change,
Thy pyramids built up with newer might
To me are nothing novel, nothing strange,
They are but dressings Of a former sight:
Our dates are brief, and therefore we admire,
What thou dost foist upon us that is old,
And rather make them born to our desire,
Than think that we before have heard them told:
Thy registers and thee I both defy,
Not wond'ring at the present, nor the past,
For thy records, and what we see doth lie,
Made more or less by thy continual haste:
  This I do vow and this shall ever be,
  I will be true despite thy scythe and thee.


                   124
If my dear love were but the child of state,
It might for Fortune's bastard be unfathered,
As subject to time's love or to time's hate,
Weeds among weeds, or flowers with flowers gathered.
No it was builded far from accident,
It suffers not in smiling pomp, nor falls
Under the blow of thralled discontent,
Whereto th' inviting time our fashion calls:
It fears not policy that heretic,
Which works on leases of short-numbered hours,
But all alone stands hugely politic,
That it nor grows with heat, nor drowns with showers.
  To this I witness call the fools of time,
  Which die for goodness, who have lived for crime.


                   125
Were't aught to me I bore the canopy,
With my extern the outward honouring,
Or laid great bases for eternity,
Which proves more short than waste or ruining?
Have I not seen dwellers on form and favour
Lose all, and more by paying too much rent
For compound sweet; forgoing simple savour,
Pitiful thrivers in their gazing spent?
No, let me be obsequious in thy heart,
And take thou my oblation, poor but free,
Which is not mixed with seconds, knows no art,
But mutual render, only me for thee.
  Hence, thou suborned informer, a true soul
  When most impeached, stands least in thy control.


                   126
O thou my lovely boy who in thy power,
Dost hold Time's fickle glass his fickle hour:
Who hast by waning grown, and therein show'st,
Thy lovers withering, as thy sweet self grow'st.
If Nature (sovereign mistress over wrack)
As thou goest onwards still will pluck thee back,
She keeps thee to this purpose, that her skill
May time disgrace, and wretched minutes kill.
Yet fear her O thou minion of her pleasure,
She may detain, but not still keep her treasure!
  Her audit (though delayed) answered must be,
  And her quietus is to render thee.


                   127
In the old age black was not counted fair,
Or if it were it bore not beauty's name:
But now is black beauty's successive heir,
And beauty slandered with a bastard shame,
For since each hand hath put on nature's power,
Fairing the foul with art's false borrowed face,
Sweet beauty hath no name no holy bower,
But is profaned, if not lives in disgrace.
Therefore my mistress' eyes are raven black,
Her eyes so suited, and they mourners seem,
At such who not born fair no beauty lack,
Slandering creation with a false esteem,
  Yet so they mourn becoming of their woe,
  That every tongue says beauty should look so.


                   128
How oft when thou, my music, music play'st,
Upon that blessed wood whose motion sounds
With thy sweet fingers when thou gently sway'st
The wiry concord that mine ear confounds,
Do I envy those jacks that nimble leap,
To kiss the tender inward of thy hand,
Whilst my poor lips which should that harvest reap,
At the wood's boldness by thee blushing stand.
To be so tickled they would change their state
And situation with those dancing chips,
O'er whom thy fingers walk with gentle gait,
Making dead wood more blest than living lips,
  Since saucy jacks so happy are in this,
  Give them thy fingers, me thy lips to kiss.


                   129
Th' expense of spirit in a waste of shame
Is lust in action, and till action, lust
Is perjured, murd'rous, bloody full of blame,
Savage, extreme, rude, cruel, not to trust,
Enjoyed no sooner but despised straight,
Past reason hunted, and no sooner had
Past reason hated as a swallowed bait,
On purpose laid to make the taker mad.
Mad in pursuit and in possession so,
Had, having, and in quest, to have extreme,
A bliss in proof and proved, a very woe,
Before a joy proposed behind a dream.
  All this the world well knows yet none knows well,
  To shun the heaven that leads men to this hell.


                   130
My mistress' eyes are nothing like the sun,
Coral is far more red, than her lips red,
If snow be white, why then her breasts are dun:
If hairs be wires, black wires grow on her head:
I have seen roses damasked, red and white,
But no such roses see I in her cheeks,
And in some perfumes is there more delight,
Than in the breath that from my mistress reeks.
I love to hear her speak, yet well I know,
That music hath a far more pleasing sound:
I grant I never saw a goddess go,
My mistress when she walks treads on the ground.
  And yet by heaven I think my love as rare,
  As any she belied with false compare.


                   131
Thou art as tyrannous, so as thou art,
As those whose beauties proudly make them cruel;
For well thou know'st to my dear doting heart
Thou art the fairest and most precious jewel.
Yet in good faith some say that thee behold,
Thy face hath not the power to make love groan;
To say they err, I dare not be so bold,
Although I swear it to my self alone.
And to be sure that is not false I swear,
A thousand groans but thinking on thy face,
One on another's neck do witness bear
Thy black is fairest in my judgment's place.
  In nothing art thou black save in thy deeds,
  And thence this slander as I think proceeds.


                   132
Thine eyes I love, and they as pitying me,
Knowing thy heart torment me with disdain,
Have put on black, and loving mourners be,
Looking with pretty ruth upon my pain.
And truly not the morning sun of heaven
Better becomes the grey cheeks of the east,
Nor that full star that ushers in the even
Doth half that glory to the sober west
As those two mourning eyes become thy face:
O let it then as well beseem thy heart
To mourn for me since mourning doth thee grace,
And suit thy pity like in every part.
  Then will I swear beauty herself is black,
  And all they foul that thy complexion lack.


                   133
Beshrew that heart that makes my heart to groan
For that deep wound it gives my friend and me;
Is't not enough to torture me alone,
But slave to slavery my sweet'st friend must be?
Me from my self thy cruel eye hath taken,
And my next self thou harder hast engrossed,
Of him, my self, and thee I am forsaken,
A torment thrice three-fold thus to be crossed:
Prison my heart in thy steel bosom's ward,
But then my friend's heart let my poor heart bail,
Whoe'er keeps me, let my heart be his guard,
Thou canst not then use rigour in my gaol.
  And yet thou wilt, for I being pent in thee,
  Perforce am thine and all that is in me.


                   134
So now I have confessed that he is thine,
And I my self am mortgaged to thy will,
My self I'll forfeit, so that other mine,
Thou wilt restore to be my comfort still:
But thou wilt not, nor he will not be free,
For thou art covetous, and he is kind,
He learned but surety-like to write for me,
Under that bond that him as fist doth bind.
The statute of thy beauty thou wilt take,
Thou usurer that put'st forth all to use,
And sue a friend, came debtor for my sake,
So him I lose through my unkind abuse.
  Him have I lost, thou hast both him and me,
  He pays the whole, and yet am I not free.


                   135
Whoever hath her wish, thou hast thy will,
And 'Will' to boot, and 'Will' in over-plus,
More than enough am I that vex thee still,
To thy sweet will making addition thus.
Wilt thou whose will is large and spacious,
Not once vouchsafe to hide my will in thine?
Shall will in others seem right gracious,
And in my will no fair acceptance shine?
The sea all water, yet receives rain still,
And in abundance addeth to his store,
So thou being rich in will add to thy will
One will of mine to make thy large will more.
  Let no unkind, no fair beseechers kill,
  Think all but one, and me in that one 'Will.'


                   136
If thy soul check thee that I come so near,
Swear to thy blind soul that I was thy 'Will',
And will thy soul knows is admitted there,
Thus far for love, my love-suit sweet fulfil.
'Will', will fulfil the treasure of thy love,
Ay, fill it full with wills, and my will one,
In things of great receipt with case we prove,
Among a number one is reckoned none.
Then in the number let me pass untold,
Though in thy store's account I one must be,
For nothing hold me, so it please thee hold,
That nothing me, a something sweet to thee.
  Make but my name thy love, and love that still,
  And then thou lov'st me for my name is Will.


                   137
Thou blind fool Love, what dost thou to mine eyes,
That they behold and see not what they see?
They know what beauty is, see where it lies,
Yet what the best is, take the worst to be.
If eyes corrupt by over-partial looks,
Be anchored in the bay where all men ride,
Why of eyes' falsehood hast thou forged hooks,
Whereto the judgment of my heart is tied?
Why should my heart think that a several plot,
Which my heart knows the wide world's common place?
Or mine eyes seeing this, say this is not
To put fair truth upon so foul a face?
  In things right true my heart and eyes have erred,
  And to this false plague are they now transferred.


                   138
When my love swears that she is made of truth,
I do believe her though I know she lies,
That she might think me some untutored youth,
Unlearned in the world's false subtleties.
Thus vainly thinking that she thinks me young,
Although she knows my days are past the best,
Simply I credit her false-speaking tongue,
On both sides thus is simple truth suppressed:
But wherefore says she not she is unjust?
And wherefore say not I that I am old?
O love's best habit is in seeming trust,
And age in love, loves not to have years told.
  Therefore I lie with her, and she with me,
  And in our faults by lies we flattered be.


                   139
O call not me to justify the wrong,
That thy unkindness lays upon my heart,
Wound me not with thine eye but with thy tongue,
Use power with power, and slay me not by art,
Tell me thou lov'st elsewhere; but in my sight,
Dear heart forbear to glance thine eye aside,
What need'st thou wound with cunning when thy might
Is more than my o'erpressed defence can bide?
Let me excuse thee, ah my love well knows,
Her pretty looks have been mine enemies,
And therefore from my face she turns my foes,
That they elsewhere might dart their injuries:
  Yet do not so, but since I am near slain,
  Kill me outright with looks, and rid my pain.


                   140
Be wise as thou art cruel, do not press
My tongue-tied patience with too much disdain:
Lest sorrow lend me words and words express,
The manner of my pity-wanting pain.
If I might teach thee wit better it were,
Though not to love, yet love to tell me so,
As testy sick men when their deaths be near,
No news but health from their physicians know.
For if I should despair I should grow mad,
And in my madness might speak ill of thee,
Now this ill-wresting world is grown so bad,
Mad slanderers by mad ears believed be.
  That I may not be so, nor thou belied,
  Bear thine eyes straight, though thy proud heart go wide.


                   141
In faith I do not love thee with mine eyes,
For they in thee a thousand errors note,
But 'tis my heart that loves what they despise,
Who in despite of view is pleased to dote.
Nor are mine cars with thy tongue's tune delighted,
Nor tender feeling to base touches prone,
Nor taste, nor smell, desire to be invited
To any sensual feast with thee alone:
But my five wits, nor my five senses can
Dissuade one foolish heart from serving thee,
Who leaves unswayed the likeness of a man,
Thy proud heart's slave and vassal wretch to be:
  Only my plague thus far I count my gain,
  That she that makes me sin, awards me pain.


                   142
Love is my sin, and thy dear virtue hate,
Hate of my sin, grounded on sinful loving,
O but with mine, compare thou thine own state,
And thou shalt find it merits not reproving,
Or if it do, not from those lips of thine,
That have profaned their scarlet ornaments,
And sealed false bonds of love as oft as mine,
Robbed others' beds' revenues of their rents.
Be it lawful I love thee as thou lov'st those,
Whom thine eyes woo as mine importune thee,
Root pity in thy heart that when it grows,
Thy pity may deserve to pitied be.
  If thou dost seek to have what thou dost hide,
  By self-example mayst thou be denied.


                   143
Lo as a careful huswife runs to catch,
One of her feathered creatures broke away,
Sets down her babe and makes all swift dispatch
In pursuit of the thing she would have stay:
Whilst her neglected child holds her in chase,
Cries to catch her whose busy care is bent,
To follow that which flies before her face:
Not prizing her poor infant's discontent;
So run'st thou after that which flies from thee,
Whilst I thy babe chase thee afar behind,
But if thou catch thy hope turn back to me:
And play the mother's part, kiss me, be kind.
  So will I pray that thou mayst have thy Will,
  If thou turn back and my loud crying still.


                   144
Two loves I have of comfort and despair,
Which like two spirits do suggest me still,
The better angel is a man right fair:
The worser spirit a woman coloured ill.
To win me soon to hell my female evil,
Tempteth my better angel from my side,
And would corrupt my saint to be a devil:
Wooing his purity with her foul pride.
And whether that my angel be turned fiend,
Suspect I may, yet not directly tell,
But being both from me both to each friend,
I guess one angel in another's hell.
  Yet this shall I ne'er know but live in doubt,
  Till my bad angel fire my good one out.


                   145
Those lips that Love's own hand did make,
Breathed forth the sound that said 'I hate',
To me that languished for her sake:
But when she saw my woeful state,
Straight in her heart did mercy come,
Chiding that tongue that ever sweet,
Was used in giving gentle doom:
And taught it thus anew to greet:
'I hate' she altered with an end,
That followed it as gentle day,
Doth follow night who like a fiend
From heaven to hell is flown away.
  'I hate', from hate away she threw,
  And saved my life saying 'not you'.


                   146
Poor soul the centre of my sinful earth,
My sinful earth these rebel powers array,
Why dost thou pine within and suffer dearth
Painting thy outward walls so costly gay?
Why so large cost having so short a lease,
Dost thou upon thy fading mansion spend?
Shall worms inheritors of this excess
Eat up thy charge? is this thy body's end?
Then soul live thou upon thy servant's loss,
And let that pine to aggravate thy store;
Buy terms divine in selling hours of dross;
Within be fed, without be rich no more,
  So shall thou feed on death, that feeds on men,
  And death once dead, there's no more dying then.


                   147
My love is as a fever longing still,
For that which longer nurseth the disease,
Feeding on that which doth preserve the ill,
Th' uncertain sickly appetite to please:
My reason the physician to my love,
Angry that his prescriptions are not kept
Hath left me, and I desperate now approve,
Desire is death, which physic did except.
Past cure I am, now reason is past care,
And frantic-mad with evermore unrest,
My thoughts and my discourse as mad men's are,
At random from the truth vainly expressed.
  For I have sworn thee fair, and thought thee bright,
  Who art as black as hell, as dark as night.


                   148
O me! what eyes hath love put in my head,
Which have no correspondence with true sight,
Or if they have, where is my judgment fled,
That censures falsely what they see aright?
If that be fair whereon my false eyes dote,
What means the world to say it is not so?
If it be not, then love doth well denote,
Love's eye is not so true as all men's: no,
How can it? O how can love's eye be true,
That is so vexed with watching and with tears?
No marvel then though I mistake my view,
The sun it self sees not, till heaven clears.
  O cunning love, with tears thou keep'st me blind,
  Lest eyes well-seeing thy foul faults should find.


                   149
Canst thou O cruel, say I love thee not,
When I against my self with thee partake?
Do I not think on thee when I forgot
Am of my self, all-tyrant, for thy sake?
Who hateth thee that I do call my friend,
On whom frown'st thou that I do fawn upon,
Nay if thou lour'st on me do I not spend
Revenge upon my self with present moan?
What merit do I in my self respect,
That is so proud thy service to despise,
When all my best doth worship thy defect,
Commanded by the motion of thine eyes?
  But love hate on for now I know thy mind,
  Those that can see thou lov'st, and I am blind.


                   150
O from what power hast thou this powerful might,
With insufficiency my heart to sway,
To make me give the lie to my true sight,
And swear that brightness doth not grace the day?
Whence hast thou this becoming of things ill,
That in the very refuse of thy deeds,
There is such strength and warrantise of skill,
That in my mind thy worst all best exceeds?
Who taught thee how to make me love thee more,
The more I hear and see just cause of hate?
O though I love what others do abhor,
With others thou shouldst not abhor my state.
  If thy unworthiness raised love in me,
  More worthy I to be beloved of thee.


                   151
Love is too young to know what conscience is,
Yet who knows not conscience is born of love?
Then gentle cheater urge not my amiss,
Lest guilty of my faults thy sweet self prove.
For thou betraying me, I do betray
My nobler part to my gross body's treason,
My soul doth tell my body that he may,
Triumph in love, flesh stays no farther reason,
But rising at thy name doth point out thee,
As his triumphant prize, proud of this pride,
He is contented thy poor drudge to be,
To stand in thy affairs, fall by thy side.
  No want of conscience hold it that I call,
  Her love, for whose dear love I rise and fall.


                   152
In loving thee thou know'st I am forsworn,
But thou art twice forsworn to me love swearing,
In act thy bed-vow broke and new faith torn,
In vowing new hate after new love bearing:
But why of two oaths' breach do I accuse thee,
When I break twenty? I am perjured most,
For all my vows are oaths but to misuse thee:
And all my honest faith in thee is lost.
For I have sworn deep oaths of thy deep kindness:
Oaths of thy love, thy truth, thy constancy,
And to enlighten thee gave eyes to blindness,
Or made them swear against the thing they see.
  For I have sworn thee fair: more perjured I,
  To swear against the truth so foul a be.


                   153
Cupid laid by his brand and fell asleep,
A maid of Dian's this advantage found,
And his love-kindling fire did quickly steep
In a cold valley-fountain of that ground:
Which borrowed from this holy fire of Love,
A dateless lively heat still to endure,
And grew a seeting bath which yet men prove,
Against strange maladies a sovereign cure:
But at my mistress' eye Love's brand new-fired,
The boy for trial needs would touch my breast,
I sick withal the help of bath desired,
And thither hied a sad distempered guest.
  But found no cure, the bath for my help lies,
  Where Cupid got new fire; my mistress' eyes.


                   154
The little Love-god lying once asleep,
Laid by his side his heart-inflaming brand,
Whilst many nymphs that vowed chaste life to keep,
Came tripping by, but in her maiden hand,
The fairest votary took up that fire,
Which many legions of true hearts had warmed,
And so the general of hot desire,
Was sleeping by a virgin hand disarmed.
This brand she quenched in a cool well by,
Which from Love's fire took heat perpetual,
Growing a bath and healthful remedy,
For men discased, but I my mistress' thrall,
  Came there for cure and this by that I prove,
  Love's fire heats water, water cools not love.


I

    Happy ye leaves when as those lily hands,
        Which hold my life in their dead-doing might, 
        Shall handle you and hold in love's soft bands, 
        Like captives trembling at the victor's sight. 
    And happy lines, on which with starry light,
        Those lamping eyes will deign sometimes to look 
        And read the sorrows of my dying sprite, 
        Written with tears in heart's close-bleeding book. 
    And happy rhymes bath'd in the sacred brook,
        Of Helicon whence she derived is, 
        When ye behold that Angel's blessed look, 
        My soul's long-lacked food, my heaven's bliss. 
    Leaves, lines, and rhymes, seek her to please alone,
        Whom if ye please, I care for other none. 

II

    Unquiet thought, whom at the first I bred,
        Of th' inward bale of my love-pined heart: 
        And sithens have with sighs and sorrows fed, 
        Till greater then my womb thou woxen art. 
    Break forth at length out of the inner part,
        In which thou lurkest like to viper's brood: 
        And seek some succour both to ease my smart 
        And also to sustain thy self with food. 
    But if in presence of that fairest proud
        Thou chance to come, fall lowly at her feet: 
        And with meek humbless and afflicted mood, 
        Pardon for thee, and grace for me entreat. 
    Which if she grant, then live, and my love cherish,
        If not, die soon, and I with thee will perish. 

III

    Thou sovereign beauty which I do admire,
        Witness the world how worthy to be praised: 
        The light whereof hath kindled heavenly fire, 
        In my frail spirit by her from baseness raised. 
    That being now with her huge brightness dazed,
        Base things I can no more endure to view; 
        But looking still on her I stand amazed, 
        At wondrous sight of so celestial hew. 
    So when my tongue would speak her praises due,
        It stopped is with thought's astonishment: 
        And when my pen would write her titles true, 
        It ravished is with fancy's wonderment: 
    Yet in my heart I then both speak and write
        The wonder that my wit cannot endite. 

IV

    New year forth looking out of Janus' gate,
        Doth seem to promise hope of new delight: 
        And bidding th' old Adieu, his passed date 
        Bids all old thoughts to die in dumpish sprite. 
    And calling forth out of sad Winter's night,
        Fresh love, that long hath slept in cheerless bower: 
        Wills him awake, and soon about him dight 
        His wanton wings and darts of deadly power. 
    For lusty spring now in his timely hour,
        Is ready to come forth him to receive; 
        And warns the Earth with diverse colored flower, 
        To deck herself, and her fair mantle weave. 
    Then you fair flower, in whom fresh youth doth rain,
        Prepare yourself new love to entertain. 

V

    Rudely thou wrongest my dear heart's desire,
        In finding fault with her too portly pride: 
        The thing which I do most in her admire, 
        Is of the world unworthy most envied. 
    For in those lofty looks is close implied,
        Scorn of base things, and sdeigne of foul dishonor: 
        Threatening rash eyes which gaze on her so wide, 
        That loosely they ne dare to look upon her. 
    Such pride is praise, such portliness is honor,
        That boldened innocence bears in her eyes: 
        And her fair countenance like a goodly banner, 
        Spreads in defiance of all enemies. 
    Was never in this world ought worthy tried,
        Without some spark of such self-pleasing pride. 

VI

    Be not dismayed that her unmoved mind
        Doth still persist in her rebellious pride: 
        And love not like to lusts of baser kind, 
        The harder won, the firmer will abide. 
    The durefull Oak, whose sap is not yet dried,
        Is long ere it conceive the kindling fire; 
        But when it once doth burn, it doth divide, 
        Great heat, and makes his flames to heaven aspire. 
    So hard it is to kindle new desire,
        In gentle breast that shall endure for ever: 
        Deep is the wound, that dints the parts entire 
        With chaste affects, that naught but death can sever. 
    Then think not long in taking little pain,
        To knit the knot, that ever shall remain. 

VII

    Fair eyes, the mirror of my mazed heart,
        What wondrous virtue is contained in you, 
        The which both life and death forth from you dart 
        Into the object of your mighty view? 
    For when ye mildly look with lovely hew,
        Then is my soul with life and love inspired 
        But when ye lour, or look on me askew, 
        Then do I die, as one with lightning fired. 
    But since that life is more than death desired,
        Look ever lovely, as becomes you best, 
        That your bright beams of my weak eyes admired, 
        May kindle living fire within my breast. 
    Such life should be the honor of your light,
        Such death the sad ensample of your might. 

VIII

    More than most fair, full of the living fire,
        Kindled above unto the maker near: 
        No eyes but joys, in which all powers conspire, 
        That to the world naught else be counted dear. 
    Through your bright beams doth not the blinded guest,
        Shoot out his darts to base affections wound: 
        But Angels come to lead frail minds to rest 
        In chaste desires on heavenly beauty bound. 
    You frame my thoughts and fashion me within,
        You stop my tongue, and teach my heart to speak, 
        You calm the storm that passion did begin, 
        Strong through your cause, but by your virtue weak. 
    Dark is the world, where your light shined never;
        Well is he born, that may behold you ever. 

IX

    Long-while I sought to what I might compare
        Those powerful eyes, which lighten my dark sprite, 
        Yet find I nought on earth to which I dare 
        Resemble th'image of their goodly light. 
    Not to the sun: for they do shine by night;
        Nor to the moon: for they are changed never; 
        Nor to the stars: for they have purer sight; 
        Nor to the fire: for they consume not ever; 
    Nor to the lightening: for they still persever;
        Nor to the diamond: for they are more tender; 
        Nor unto crystal: for nought may them sever; 
        Nor unto glass: such baseness mought offend her; 
    Then to the Maker self they likest be,
        Whose light doth lighten all that here we see. 

X

    Unrighteous lord of love, what law is this,
        That me thou makest thus tormented be: 
        The whiles she lordeth in licentious bliss 
        Of her freewill, scorning both thee and me. 
    See how the Tyraness doth joy to see
        The huge massacres which her eyes do make: 
        And humbled hearts brings captives unto thee, 
        That thou of them mayst mighty vengeance take. 
    But her proud heart do thou a little shake
        And that high look, with which she doth comptroll 
        All this world's pride, bow to a baser make, 
        And all her faults in thy black book enroll. 
    That I may laugh at her in equal sort,
        As she doth laugh at me and makes my pain her sport. 

XI

    Daily when I do seek and sew for peace,
        And hostages do offer for my truth: 
        She cruel warrior doth herself address 
        To battle, and the weary war renew'th. 
    Nor will be moved with reason or with ruth,
        To grant small respite to my restless toil: 
        But greedily her fell intent persueth, 
        Of my poor life to make unpityed spoil. 
    Yet my poor life, all sorrows to assoyle,
        I would her yield, her wrath to pacify: 
        But then she seeks with torment and turmoil, 
        To force me live, and will not let me die. 
    All pain hath end and every war hath peace,
        But mine no price nor prayer may surcease. 

XII

    One day I sought with her heart-thrilling eyes
        To make a truce, and terms to entertain; 
        All fearless then of so false enemies, 
        Which sought me to entrap in treason's train. 
    So as I then disarmed did remain,
        A wicked ambush which lay hidden long 
        In the close court of her guileful eyen, 
        Thence breaking forth did thick about me throng. 
    Too feeble I t'abide the brunt so strong,
        Was forced to yield myself into their hands: 
        Who me captiving straight with rigorous wrong, 
        Have ever since me kept in cruel bands. 
    So Lady, now to you I do complain
        Against your eyes that justice I may gain. 

XIII

    In that proud port, which her so goodly graceth,
        Whiles her fair face she rears up to the sky: 
        And to the ground her eyelids low embaseth, 
        Most goodly temperature ye may descry, 
    Mild humbless mixed with awful majesty.
        For looking on the earth whence she was born, 
        Her mind remembreth her mortality, 
        What so is fairest shall to earth return. 
    But that same lofty countenance seems to scorn
        Base thing, and think how she to heaven may climb: 
        Treading down earth as lothsome and forlorn, 
        That hinders heavenly thoughts with drossy slime. 
    Yet lowly still vouchsafe to look on me,
        Such lowliness shall make you lofty be. 

XIV

    Return again my forces late dismayed,
        Unto the siege by you abondon'd quite, 
        Great shame it is to leave like one afraid, 
        So fair a peace for one repulse so light. 
    'Gainst such strong castles needeth greater might,
        Than those small forts which ye were wont belay: 
        Such haughty minds enur'd to hardy fight 
        Disdain to yield unto the first assay. 
    Bring therefore all the forces that ye may,
        And lay incessant battery to her heart, 
        Plaints, prayers, vows, ruth, sorrow, and dismay, 
        Those engines can the proudest love convert. 
    And if those fail, fall down and die before her,
        So dying live, and living do adore her. 

XV

    Ye tradefull Merchants, that with weary toil,
        Do seek most precious things to make your gain; 
        And both the Indias of their treasures spoil, 
        What needeth you to seek so far in vain? 
    For lo my love doth in her self contain
        All this world's riches that may far be found, 
        If saphires, lo her eyes be saphires plain, 
        If rubies, lo her lips be rubies sound: 
    If pearls, her teeth be pearls both pure and round;
        If ivory, her forhead ivory weene; 
        If gold, her locks are finest gold on ground; 
        If silver, her fair hands are silver sheen. 
    But that which fairest is, but few behold,
        Her mind adorned with virtues manifold. 

XVI

    One day as I unwarily did gaze
        On those fair eyes my love's immortal light: 
        The whiles my 'stonished heart stood in amaze, 
        Through sweet illusion of her look's delight. 
    I mote perceive how in her glancing sight,
        Legions of loves with little wings did fly: 
        Darting their deadly arrows fiery bright, 
        At every rash beholder passing by. 
    One of those archers closely I did spy,
        Aiming his arrow at my very heart: 
        When suddenly with twinkle of her eye, 
        The Damsel broke his misintended dart. 
    Had she not so done, sure I had been slain,
        Yet as it was, I hardly 'scaped with pain. 

XVII

    The glorious portrait of that Angel's face,
        Made to amaze weak men's confused skill: 
        And this world's worthless glory to embase, 
        What pen, what pencil can express her fill? 
    For though he colours could devise at will,
        And eke his learned hand at pleasure guide, 
        Least trembling it his workmanship should spill, 
        Yet many wondrous things there are beside. 
    The sweet eye-glances, that like arrows glide,
        The charming smiles, that rob sense from the heart: 
        The lovely pleasance and the lofty pride, 
        Cannot expressed be by any art. 
    A greater craftsman's hand thereto doth need,
        That can express the life of things indeed. 

XVIII

    The rolling wheel that runneth often round,
        The hardest steel in tract of time doth tear: 
        And drizling drops that often do redound, 
        The firmest flint doth in continuance wear. 
    Yet cannot I, with many a dropping tear,
        And long entreaty, soften her hard heart: 
        That she will once vouchsafe my plaint to hear, 
        Or look with pity on my painful smart. 
    But when I plead, she bids me play my part,
        And when I weep, she says tears are but water: 
        And when I sigh, she says I know the art, 
        And when I wail she turns herself to laughter. 
    So do I weep, and wail, and plead in vain,
        Whiles she as steel and flint doth still remain. 

XIX

    The merry cuckoo, messenger of spring,
        His trumpet shrill hath thrice already sounded: 
        That warns all lovers wait upon their king, 
        Who now is coming forth with garland crowned. 
    With noise whereof the choir of birds resounded
        Their anthems sweet devised of love's praise, 
        That all the woods their echoes back rebounded, 
        As if they knew the meaning of their lays. 
    But 'mongst them all, which did Love's honor raise
        No word was heard of her that most it ought, 
        But she his precept proudly disobeys, 
        And doth his idle message set at nought. 
    Therefore O love, unless she turn to thee
        Ere cuckoo end, let her a rebel be. 

XX

    In vain I seek and sue to her for grace,
        And do mine humbled heart before her pour, 
        The whiles her foot she in my neck doth place, 
        And tread my life down in the lowly floor. 
    And yet the lion that is lord of power,
        And reighneth over every beast in field, 
        In his most pride disdaineth to devour 
        The silly lamb that to his might doth yield. 
    But she more cruel and more savage wild,
        Then either lion or lioness: 
        Shames not to be with guiltless blood defiled, 
        But taketh glory in her cruelness. 
    Fairer than fairest, let none ever say,
        That ye were blooded in a yielded prey. 

XXI

    Was it the work of nature or of art,
        Which tempered so the feature of her face, 
        That pride and meekness mixed by equal part, 
        Do both appear t'adorn her beauty's grace? 
    For with mild pleasance, which doth pride displace,
        She to her love doth lookers' eyes allure: 
        And with stern countenance back again doth chase 
        Their looser looks that stir up lusts impure. 
    With such strange terms her eyes she doth inure,
        That with one look she doth my life dismay: 
        And with another doth it straight recure, 
        Her smile me draws, her frown me drives away. 
    Thus doth she train and teach me with her looks,
        Such art of eyes I never read in books. 

XXII

    This holy season fit to fast and pray,
        Men to devotion ought to be inclined: 
        Therefore, I likewise on so holy day, 
        For my sweet Saint some service fit will find. 
    Her temple fair is built within my mind,
        In which her glorious image placed is, 
        On which my thoughts do day and night attend 
        Like sacred priests that never think amiss. 
    There I to her as th'author of my bliss
        Will build an altar to appease her ire: 
        And on the same my heart will sacrifice, 
        Burning in flames of pure and chaste desire: 
    The which vouchsafe O godess to accept
        Amongst thy dearest relics to be kept. 

XXIII

    Penelope for her Ulysses' sake,
        Devised a web her wooers to deceive; 
        In which the work that she all day did make 
        The same at night she did again unreave. 
    Such subtle craft my Damsel doth conceive,
        Th'importune suit of my desire to shun: 
        For all that I in many days do weave, 
        In one short hour I find by her undone. 
    So when I think to end that I begun,
        I must begin and never bring to end: 
        For with one look she spills that long I spun, 
        And with one word my whole year's work doth rend. 
    Such labour like the spider's web I find,
        Whose fruitless work is broken with least wind. 

XXIV

    When I behold that beauty's wonderment,
        And rare perfection of each goodly part; 
        Of nature's skill the only complement, 
        I honor and admire the maker's art. 
    But when I feel the bitter baleful smart,
        Which her fair eyes unwares do work in me: 
        That death out of their shiny beams do dart, 
        I think that I a new Pandora see; 
    Whom all the Gods in council did agree,
        Into this sinful world from heaven to send: 
        That she to wicked men a scourge should be, 
        For all their faults with which they did offend. 
    But since ye are my scourge I will intreat,
        That for my faults ye will me gently beat. 

XXV

    How long shall this like dying life endure,
        And know no end of her own mystery: 
        But waste and wear away in terms unsure, 
        'Twixt fear and hope depending doubtfully? 
    Yet better were at once to let me die,
        And show the last ensample of your pride: 
        Than to torment me thus with cruelty, 
        To prove your power, which I too well have tried. 
    But yet if in your hardened breast ye hide,
        A close intent at last to show me grace: 
        Then all the woes and wrecks which I abide, 
        As means of bliss I gladly will embrace. 
    And wish that more and greater they might be,
        That greater meede at last may turn to me. 

XXVI

    Sweet is the rose, but grows upon a briar;
        Sweet in the Juniper, but sharp his bough; 
        Sweet is the Eglantine, but pricketh near; 
        Sweet is the firbloom, but his branches rough. 
    Sweet is the Cypress, but his rind is tough,
        Sweet is the nut, but bitter is his pill; 
        Sweet is the broom-flower, but yet sour enough; 
        And sweet is Moly, but his root is ill. 
    So every sweet with sour is tempered still
        That maketh it be coveted the more: 
        For easy things that may be got at will, 
        Most sorts of men do set but little store. 
    Why then should I account of little pain,
        That endless pleasure shall unto me gain. 

XXVII

    Fair proud now tell me why should fair be proud,
        Sith all world's glory is but dross unclean: 
        And in the shade of death itself shall shroud, 
        But ever now thereof ye little weene. 
    That goodly idol now so gay beseen,
        Shall doff her flesh's borrowed fair attire: 
        And be forgot as it had never been, 
        That many now much worship and admire. 
    Ne any then shall after it inquire,
        Ne any mention shall thereof remain: 
        But what this verse, that never shall expire, 
        Shall to you purchase with her thankless pain. 
    Fair be no longer proud of that shall perish,
        But that which shall you make immortal, cherish. 

XXVIII

    The laurel leaf, which you this day do wear,
        Gives me great hope of your relenting mind: 
        For since it is the badge which I do bear, 
        Ye wearing it do seem to me inclined: 
    The power thereof, which of in me I find,
        Let in likewise your gentle breast inspire 
        With sweet infusion, and put you in mind 
        Of that proud maid, whom now those leave attire: 
    Proud Daphne scorning Phoebus' lovely fire,
        On the Thessalian shore from him did fly: 
        For which the gods in their revengeful ire 
        Did her transform into a laurel tree. 
    Then fly no more fair love from Phoebus' chace,
        But in your breast his leaf and love embrace. 

XXIX

    See how the stubborn damsel doth deprave
        My simple meaning with disdainful scorn: 
        And by the bay which I unto her gave, 
        Accounts myself her captive quite forlorn. 
    The bay (quoth she) is of the victors borne,
        Yielded them by the vanquished as their meeds, 
        And they therewith do poets' heads adorn, 
        To sing the glory of their famous deeds. 
    But sith she will the conquest challenge needs,
        Let her accept me as her faithful thrall, 
        That her great triumph which my skill exceeds, 
        I may in trump of fame blaze over all. 
    Then would I deck her head with glorious bays,
        And fill the world with her victorious praise. 

XXX

    My love is like to ice, and I to fire;
        How comes it then that this her cold so great 
        Is not dissolved through my so-hot desire, 
        But harder grows the more I her intreat? 
    Or how comes it that my exceeding heat
        Is not delayed by her heart frozen cold; 
        But that I burn much more in boiling sweat, 
        And feel my flames augmented manifold? 
    What more miraculous thing may be told
        That fire which all things melts, should harden ice: 
        And ice which is congealed with senseless cold, 
        Should kindle fire by wonderful device? 
    Such is the power of love in gentle mind,
        That it can alter all the course of kind. 

XXXI

    Ah why hath nature to so hard a heart
        Given so goodly gifts of beauty's grace?
        Whose pride depraves each other better part,
        And all those pretty ornaments deface.
    Sith to all other beasts of bloody race,
        A dreadful countenance she given hath,
        That with their terror all the rest may chase,
        And warn to shun the danger of their wrath.
    But my proud one doth work the greater scath,
        Through sweet allurement of her lovely hue:
        That she the better may in bloody bath
        Of such poor thralls her cruel hands embrew.
    But did she know how ill these two accord,
        Such cruelty she would have soon abhored.

XXXII

    The painful smith with force of fervent heat,
        The hardest iron soon doth mollify:
        That with his heavy sledge he can it beat,
        And fashion to what he it list apply.
    Yet cannot all these flames in which I fry,
        Her heart more hard than iron soft a whit:
        Ne all the plaints and prayers with which I
        Do beat on th'anvil of her stubborn wit;
    But still the more she fervent sees my fit,
        The more she frieseth in her willful pride:
        And harder grows the harder she is smit,
        With all the plaints which to her be applied.
    What then remains but I to ashes burn,
        And she to stones at length all frozen turn?

XXXIII

    Great wrong I do, I can it not deny,
        To that most sacred empress my dear dread,
        Not finishing her Queen of Fa&ed.ry,
        That mote enlarge her living praises dead;
    But lodwick, this of grace to me aread:
        Do ye not think the'accomplishment of it,
        Sufficient work for one man's simple head,
        All were it as the rest but rudely writ.
    How then should I without another wit,
        Think ever to endure so tedious toil,
        Sins that this one is tossed with troublous fit,
        Of a proud love, that both my spirit spoil.
    Cease then, till she vouchsafe to grant me rest,
        Or lend you me another loving breast.

XXXIV

    Like a ship that through the Ocean wide,
        By conduct of some star doth make her way,
        Whenas a storm hath dimmed her trusty guide,
        Out of her course doth wander far astray.
    So I whose star, that wont with her bright ray,
        Me to direct, with clouds is overcast,
        Do wander now in darkness and dismay,
        Through hidden perils round about me plast.
    Yet hope I well, that when this storm is past
        My Helice the lodestar of my life
        Will shine again, and look on me at last,
        With lovely light to clear my cloudy grief.
    Till then I wander carefull comfortless,
        In secret sorrow and sad pensiveness.

XXXV

    My hungry eyes through greedy covetize,
        Still to behold the object of their pain,
        With no contentment can themselves suffice:
        But having pine and having not complain.
    For lacking it they cannot life sustain,
        And having it they gaze on it the more:
        In their amazement like Narcissus vain
        Whose eyes him starv'd: so plenty makes me poor.
    Yet are mine eyes so filled with the store
        Of that fair sight, that nothing else they brook,
        But loath the things which they did like before,
        And can no more endure on them to look.
    All this world's glory seemeth vain to me,
        And all their shows but shadows, saving she.

XXXVI

    Tell me when shall these weary woes have end,
        Or shall their ruthless torment never cease:
        But all my days in pining langor spend,
        Without hope of aswagement or release.
    Is there no means for me to purchase peace,
        Or make agreement with her thrilling eyes:
        But that their cruelty doth still increase,
        And daily more augment my miseries.
    But when ye have shewed all extermities,
        Then think how little glory ye have gained:
        By slaying him, whose life though ye dispise,
        Mote have your life in honour long maintained.
    But by his death which some perhaps will moan,
        Ye shall condemned be of many a one.

XXXVII

    What guile is this, that those her golden tresses,
        She doth attire under a net of gold:
        And with sly skill so cunningly them dresses,
        That which is gold or hair, may scarce be told?
    Is it that men's frail eyes, which gaze too bold,
        She may entangle in that golden snare:
        And being caught may craftily enfold,
        Their weaker hearts, which are not well aware?
    Take heed therefore, mine eyes, how ye do stare
        Henceforth too rashly on that guileful net,
        In which if ever ye entrapped are,
        Out of her bands ye by no means shall get.
    Fondness it were for any being free,
        To covet fetters, though they golden be.

XXXVIII

    Arion, when through tempests' cruel wrack,
        He forth was thrown into the greedy seas:
        Through the sweet music which his harp did make
        Allured a dolphin him from death to ease.
    But my rude music, which was wont to please
        Some dainty ears, cannot with any skill,
        The dreadful tempest of her wrath appease,
        Nor move the dolphin from her stubborn will.
    But in her pride she doth persever still,
        All careless how my life for her decays:
        Yet with one word she can in save or spill,
        To spill were pitty, but to save were praise.
    Choose rather to be praised for doing good,
        Than to be blam'd for spilling guiltless blood.

XXXIX

    Sweet smile, the daughter of the queen of love,
        Expressing all thy mother's powerful art:
        With which she wonts to temper angry Jove,
        When all the gods he threats with thund'ring dart.
    Sweet is thy virtue as thy self sweet art,
        For when on me thou shinedst late in sadness,
        A melting pleasance ran through every part,
        And me revived with heart robbing gladness.
    Whylest rapt with joy resembling heavenly madness,
        My soul was ravished quite as in a trance:
        And feeling thence no more her sorrow's sadness,
        Fed on the fullness of that cheerful glance,
    More sweet than nectar or ambrosial meat,
        Seemed every bit, which thenceforth I did eat.

XL

    Mark when she smiles with amiable cheer,
        And tell me whereto can ye liken it:
        When on each eyelid sweetly do appear
        An hundred Graces as in shade to sit.
    Likest it seemeth in my simple wit
        Unto the fair sunshine in summer's day:
        That when a dreadful storm away is flit,
        Through the broad world doth spread his goodly ray:
    At sight whereof each bird that sits on spray,
        And every beast that to his den was fled
        Comes forth afresh out of their late dismay,
        And to the light lift up their drooping head.
    So my storm-beaten heart likewise is cheered,
        With that sunshine when cloudy looks are cleared.

XLI

    Is it her nature or is it her will,
        To be so cruel to an humbled foe?
        If nature, then she may it mend with skill,
        If will, then she at will may will forgo.
    But if her nature and her will be so,
        that she will plague the man that loves her most:
        And take delight t'increase a wretch's woe,
        Then all her nature's goodly gifts are lost.
    And that same glorious beauty's idle boast,
        Is but a bait such wretches to beguile:
        As being long in her love's tempest tossed,
        She means at last to make her piteous spoil.
    Of fairest fair let never it be named,
        That so fair beauty was so foully shamed.

XLII

    The love which me so cruelly tormenteth,
        So pleasing is in my extremest pain:
        That all the more my sorrow it augmenteth,
        The more I love and do embrace my bane.
    Ne do I wish (for wishing were but vain)
        To be acquit from my continual smart:
        But joy her thrall for ever to remain,
        And yield for pledge my poor captived heart;
    The which that it from her may never start,
        Let her, if please her, bind with adamant chain:
        And from all wandering loves which mote pervert,
        His safe assurance strongly it restrain.
    Only let her abstain from cruelty,
        And do me not before my time to die.

XLIII

    Shall I then silent be or shall I speak?
        And if I speak, her wrath renew I shall:
        And if I silent be, my heart will break,
        Or choked be with overflowing gall.
    What tyranny is this both my heart to thrall,
        And eke my tongue with proud restraint to tie?
        That neither I may speak nor think at all,
        But like a stupid stock in silence die.
    Yet I my heart with silence secretly
        Will teach to speak, and my just cause to plead:
        And eke mine eyes with meek humility,
        Love-learned letters to her eyes to read.
    Which her deep wit, that true hearts' thought can spell,
        Will soon conceive, and learn to construe well.

XLIV

    When those renowned noble peers of Greece,
        Through stubborn pride amongst themselves did war,
        Forgetful of the famous golden fleece,
        Then Orpheus with his harp their strife did bar.
    But this continual cruel civil war
        The which myself against myself do make:
        Whilest my weak powers of passions warried are,
        No skill can stint nor reason can aslake.
    But when in hand my tuneless harp I take,
        Then do I more augment my foes' despight:
        And grief renew, and passions do awake
        To battle, fresh against myself to fight.
    'Mongst whom the more I seek to settle peace,
        The more I find their malice to increase.

XLV

    Leave, lady, in your glass of crystal clean,
        Your goodly self for evermore to view:
        And in myself, my inward self I mean,
        Most lively like behold your semblance true.
    Within my heart, though hardly it can shew
        Thing so divine to view of earthly eye,
        The fair Idea of your celestial hue,
        And every part remains immortally:
    And were it not that through your cruelty,
        With sorrow dimmed and deformed it were:
        The goodly image of your visnomy,
        Dearer than crystal would therein appear.
    But if yourself in me ye plain will see,
        Remove the cause by which your fair beams darkened be.

XLVI

    When my abode's prefixed time is spent,
        My cruel fair straight bids me wend my way:
        But then from heaven most hideous storms are sent
        As willing me against her will to stay.
    Whom then shall I or heaven or her obey?
        The heavens know best what is the best form:
        But as she will, whose will my life doth sway,
        My lower heaven, so it perforce must be.
    But ye high heavens, that all this sorrow see,
        Sith all your tempests cannot hold me back:
        Aswage your storms, or else both you and she,
        Will both together me too sorely wrack.
    Enough it is for one man to sustain
        The storms, which she alone on me doth rain.

XLVII

    Trust not the treason of those smiling looks,
        Until ye have their guilefull trains well tried;
        For they are like but unto golden hooks,
        That from the foolish fish their baits do hide:
    So she with flattering smiles weak hearts doth guide
        Unto her love, and tempt to their decay,
        Whom being caught she kills with cruel pride,
        And feeds at pleasure on the wretched pray:
    Yet even whilst her bloody hands them slay,
        Her eyes look lovely and upon them smile:
        That they take pleasure in her cruel play,
        And dying do themselves of pain beguile.
    O mighty charm which makes men love their bane,
        And think they die with pleasure, live with pain.

XLVIII

    Innocent paper, whom too cruel hand
        Did make the matter to avenge her ire:
        And ere she could thy cause well understand,
        Did sacrifice unto the greedy fire.
    Well worthy thou to have found better hire,
        Then so bad end for heretics ordained;
        Yet heresy nor treason didst conspire,
        But plead thy master's cause unjustly pained.
    Whom she all careless of his grief contrained
        To utter forth the anguish of his heart;
        And would not hear, when he to her complained,
        The piteous passion of his dying smart.
    Yet live for ever, though against her will,
        And speak her good, though she requite it ill.

XLIX

    Fair cruel, why are you so fierce and cruel?
        Is it because your eyes have power to kill?
        Then know, that mercy is the mightiest jewel,
        And greater glory think to save, than spill.
    But if it be your pleasure and proud will,
        To show the power of your imperious eyes:
        Then not on him that never thought you ill,
        But bend your force against your enemies.
    Let them feel th'utmost of your cruelties,
        And kill with looks, as Cockatrices do:
        But him that at your footstool humbled lies,
        With merciful regard, give mercy to.
    Such mercy shall you make admired to be,
        So shall you live by giving life to me.

L

    Long languishing in double malady,
        Of my heart's wound and of my body's grief,
        There came to me a leach that would apply
        Fit medicines for my body's best relief.
    Vain man (quoth I) that hast but little priefe
        In deep discovery of the mind's disease,
        Is not the heart of all the body chief?
        And rules the members as itself doth please.
    Then with some cordials seek first to appease
        The inward langour of my wounded heart,
        And then my body shall have shortly ease:
        But such sweet cordials pass physicians' art,
    Then my life's Leach do you your skill reveal,
        And with one salve both heart and body heal.

LI

    Do I not see that fairest images
        Of hardest marble are of purpose made?
        For that they should endure through many ages,
        Ne let their famous monuments to fade.
    Why then do I, untrained in lovers' trade,
        Her hardness blame which I should more commend?
        Sith never aught was excellect assayed,
        Which was not hard t'achieve and bring to end.
    Ne aught so hard, but he that would attend,
        Mote soften it and to his will allure:
        So do I hope her stubborn heart to bend,
        And that it then more steadfast will endure.
    Only my pains will be the more to get her,
        But having her, my joy will be the greater.

LII

    So oft as homeward I from her depart,
        I go like one that having lost the field,
        Is prisoner led away with heavy heart,
        Despoiled of warlike arms and knowen shield.
    So do I now myself a prisoner yield,
        To sorrow and to solitary pain:
        From presence of my dearest dear exiled,
        Longwhile alone in languor to remain.
    There let no thought of joy or pleasure vain,
        Dare to approach, that may my solace breed:
        But sudden dumps and dreary sad disdain,
        Of all worlds gladness more my torment feed.
    So I her absence will my penance make,
        That of her presence I my mead may take.

LIII

    The panther knowing that his spotted hide
        Doth please all beasts, but that his looks them fray,
        Within a bush his dreadful head doth hide,
        To let thm gaze whilst he on them may prey.
    Right so my cruel fair with me doth play,
        For with the goodly semblance of her hue
        She doth allure me to mine own decay,
        And then no mercy will unto me shew.
    Great shame it is, thing so divine in view,
        Made for to be the world's most ornament,
        To make the bait her gazers to enbrew,
        Good shames to be too ill an instrument.
    But mercy doth with beauty best agree,
        As in their maker ye them best may see.

LIV

    Of this world's theatre in which we stay,
        My love like the spectator idly sits
        Beholding me that all the pageants play,
        Disguising diversely my troubled wits.
    Sometimes I joy when glad occasion fits,
        And mask in mirth like to a comedy:
        Soon after when my joy to sorrow flits,
        I wail and make my woes a tragedy.
    Yet she beholding me with constant eye,
        Delights not in my mirth nor rues my smart:
        But when I laugh she mocks, and when I cry
        She laughs, and hardens evermore her heart.
    What then can move her? if not mirth nor moan,
        She is no woman, but senseless stone.

LV

    So oft as I her beauty do behold,
        And therewith do her cruelty compare,
        I marvel of what substance was the mould
        The which her made at once so cruel fair.
    Not earth; for her high thoughts more heavenly are,
        Not water; for her love doth burn like fire:
        Not air; for she is not so light or rare,
        Not fire; for she doth freeze with faint desire.
    Then needs another element inquire
        Whereof she mote be made; that is the sky.
        For to the heaven her haughty looks aspire:
        And eke her mind is pure immortal high.
    Then sith to heaven ye likened are the best,
        Be like in mercy as in all the rest.

LVI

    Fair ye be sure, but cruel and unkind,
        As is the tiger that with greediness
        Hunts after blood, when he by chance doth find
        A feeble beast, doth felly him oppress.
    Fair be ye sure, but proud and pityless,
        As is a storm, that all things doth prostrate:
        Finding a tree alone all comfortless,
        Beats on it strongly it to ruinate.
    Fair be ye sure, but hard and obstinate,
        As is a rock amidst the raging floods:
        'Gainst which a ship of succour desolate,
        Doth suffer wreck both of herself and goods.
    That ship, that tree, and that same beast am I,
        Whom ye do wreck, do ruin, and destroy.

LVII

    Sweet warrior, when shall I have peace with you?
        High time it is, this war now ended were:
        Which I no longer can endure to sue,
        Ne your incessant battery more to bear:
    So weak my powers, so sore my wounds appear
        That wonder is how I should live a jot,
        Seeing my heart through launched everywhere
        With thousand arrows, which your eyes have shot:
    Yet shoot ye sharply still, and spare me not,
        But glory think to make these cruel stoures.
        Ye cruel one, what glory can be got,
        In slaying him that would live gladly yours?
    Make peace therefore, and grant me timely grace,
        That all my wouds will heal in little space.

LVIII. By her that is most assured to herself.

    Weak is th'assurance that weak flesh reposeth
        In her own power, and scorneth others' aid:
        That soonest falls when as she most supposeth
        Herself assured, and is of nought afraid.
    All flesh is frail, and all her strength unstayed,
        Like a vain bubble blown up with air:
        Devouring time and changeful chance have preyed
        Her glory's pride that none may it repair.
    Ne none so rich or wise, so strong or fair,
        But faileth trusting on his own assurance:
        And he that standeth on the highest stair
        Falls lowest: for on earth nought hath endurence.
    Why then do ye proud fair, misdeem so far,
        That to yourself ye most assured are.

LIX

    Thrice happy she, that is so well assured
        Unto herself and settled so in heart:
        That neither will for better be allured,
        Ne feared with worse to any chance start:
    But like a steady ship doth strongly part
        The raging waves and keeps her course aright:
        Ne aught for tempest doth from it depart,
        Ne aught for fairer weather false delight.
    Such self assurance need not fear the spite
        Of grudging foes, ne favor seek of friends:
        But in the stay of her own steadfast might,
        Neither to one herself nor another bends.
    Most happy she that most assured doth rest,
        But he most happy who such one loves best.

LX

    They that in course of heavenly spheres are skilled,
        To every planet point his sundry year:
        In which her circle's voyage is fulfilled,
        As Mars in three-score years doth run his sphere.
    So since the winged God his planet clear,
        Began in me to move, one year is spent:
        The which doth longer unto me appear,
        Than all those forty which my life outwent.
    Then by that count, which lovers' books invent,
        The sphere of Cupid forty years contains:
        Which I have wasted in long languishment,
        That seemed the longer for my greater pains.
    But let my love's fair planet short her ways
        This year ensuing, or else short my days.

LXI

    The glorious image of the maker's beauty,
        My sovereign saint, the idol of my thought,
        Dare not henceforth above the bounds of duty
        T'accuse of pride, or rashly blame for aught.
    For being as she is divinely wrought,
        And of the brood of angels heavenly born;
        And with the crew of blessed saints upbrought,
        Each of which did her with their gifts adorn;
    The bud of joy, the blossom of the morn,
        The beam of light, whom mortal eyes admire:
        What reason is it then but she should scorn
        Base things, that to her love too bold aspire?
    Such heavenly forms ought rather worshipped be,
        Than dare be lov'd by men of mean degree.

LXII

    The weary year his race now having run,
        The new begins his compassed course anew:
        With shew of morning mild he hath begun,
        Betokening peace and plenty to ensue.
    So let us, which this change of weather view,
        Change each our minds and former lives amend,
        The old year's sins forepast let us eschew,
        And fly the faults with which we did offend.
    Then shall the new year's joy forth freshly send,
        Into the glooming world his gladsome ray:
        And all these storms which now his beauty blend,
        Shall turn to calms and timely clear away.
    So likewise love cheer you and your heavy sprite,
        And change old year's annoy to new delight.

:poem
LXIII

    After long storms and tempests' sad assay,
        Which hardly I endured heretofore:
        In dread of death and dangerous dismay,
        With which my silly bark was tossed sore:
    I do at length descry the happy shore,
        In which I hope ere long for to arrive;
        Fair soil it seems from far and fraught with store
        Of all that dear and dainty is alive.
    Most happy he that can at last achieve
        The joyous safety of so sweet a rest:
        Whose least delight sufficeth to deprive
        Remembrance of all pains which him oppressed.
    All pains are nothing in respect to this,
        All sorrows short that gain eternal bliss.

LXIV

    Coming to kiss her lips, (such grace I found)
        Me seemed I smelled a garden of sweet flowers,
        That dainty odors from them threw around
        For damsels fit to deck their lovers' bowers.
    Her lips did smell like unto Gillyflowers,
        Her ruddy cheeks like unto Roses red:
        Her snowy brows like budded Bellamores,
        Her lovely eyes like Pinks but newly spread.
    Her goodly bosom like a strawberry bed,
        Her neck like to a bunch of Columbines:
        Her breast like Lillies, ere their leaves be shed,
        Her nipples like young blossomed Jasmines.
    Such fragrant flowers do give most odorous smell,
        But her sweet odor did them all excel.

LXV

    The doubt which you misdeem, fair love, is vain,
        That fondly fear to lose your liberty,
        When losing one, two liberties you gain,
        And make him bond that bondage erst did fly.
    Sweet be the bands, the which true love doth tie,
        Without constraint or dread of any ill:
        The gentle bird feels no captivity
        Within her cage, but sings and feeds her fill.
    There pride dare not approach, nor discord spill
        The league 'twixt them, that loyal love hath bound:
        But simple truth and mutual good will,
        Seeks with sweet peace to salve each others' wound:
    There faith doth fearless dwell in brazen tower,
        And spotless pleasure builds her sacred bower.

LXVI

    To all those happy blissing which ye have,
        With plenteous hand by heaven upon you thrown,
        This one disparagement they to you gave,
        That ye your love lent to so mean a one.
    Yet whose high worths surpassing paragon,
        Could not on earth have found one fit for mate,
        Ne but in heaven matchable to none,
        Why did ye stoop unto so lowly state?
    But ye thereby much greater glory gate,
        Than had ye sorted with a prince's peer:
        For now your light doth more itself dilate,
        And in my darkness greater doth appear.
    Yet since your light hath once enlumined me,
        With my reflex yours shall increased be.

LXVII

    Like as a huntsman after weary chase,
        Seeing the game from him escaped away,
        Sits down to rest him in some shady place,
        With panting hounds beguiled of their pray:
    So after long pursuit and vain assay,
        When I all weary had the chase forsook,
        The gentle deer returned the self-same way,
        Thinking to quench her thirst at the next brook.
    There she beholding me with milder look,
        Sought not to fly, but fearless still did bide:
        Till I in hand her yet half-trembling took,
        And with her own goodwill here firmly tied.
    Strange thing me seemed to see a beast so wild,
        So goodly won with her own will beguiled.

LXVIII

    Most glorious Lord of life, that on this day,
        Didst make thy triumph over death and sin:
        And having harrowed hell, didst bring away
        Captivity thence captive us to win:
    This joyous day, dear Lord, with joy begin,
        And grant that we for whom thou didst die
        Being with thy dear blood clean washed from sin,
        May live for ever in felicity.
    And that thy love we weighing worthily,
        May likewise love thee for the same again:
        And for thy sake that all like dear didst buy,
        With love may one another entertain.
    So let us love, like as we ought,
        Love is the lesson which the Lord us taught.

LXIX

    The famous warriors of the antick world,
        Used trophies to erect in stately wise:
        In which they would the records have enrolled,
        Of their great deeds and valorous emprize.
    What trophy then shall I most fit devise,
        In which I may record the memory
        Of my love's conquest, peerless beauty's prize,
        Adorn'd with honour, love, and chastity.
    Even this verse vowed to eternity,
        Shall be thereof immortal monument:
        And tell her praise to all posterity,
        That may admire such world's rare wonderment.
    The happy purchase of my glorious spoil,
        Gotten at last with labour and long toil.

LXX

    Fresh spring the herald of love's might king,
        In whose coat-armor richly are displayed
        All sorts of flowers the which on earth do spring
        In goodly colors gloriously displayed.
    Go to my love, where she is careless laid,
        Yet in her winter's bower not well awake:
        Tell her the joyous time will not be staid
        Unless she do him by the forelock take.
    Bid her therefore herself soon ready make,
        To wait on love amongst his lovely crew:
        Where every one that misseth than her make,
        Shall be by him amearst with penance due.
    Make haste therefore sweet love, whilst it is prime,
        For none can call again the passed time.

LXXI

    I joy to see how in your drawen work,
        Yourself unto the bee ye do compare:
        And me unto the Spider that doth lurk,
        In close await to catch her unaware.
    Right so youself were caught in cunning snare
        Of a dear foe, and thralled to his love:
        In whose straight bands ye now captived are
        So firmly, that ye never may remove.
    But as your work is woven all above,
        With woodbine flowers and fragrant Eglantine;
        So sweet your prison you in time shall prove,
        With many dear delights bedecked fine.
    And all thenceforth eternal peace shall see,
        Between the spider and the gentle bee.

LXXII

    Oft when my spirit doth spread her bolder wings,
        In mind to mount up to the purest sky:
        It down is weighed with thought of earthly things
        And clogged with burden of mortality.
    Where when that sovereign beauty it doth spy,
        Resembling heaven's glory in her light:
        Drawn with sweet pleasure's bait, it back doth fly,
        And unto heaven forgets her former flight.
    There my frail fancy fed with full delight,
        Doth bathe in bliss and mantleth most at ease:
        Ne thinks of other heaven, but how it might
        Her heart's desire with most contentment please.
    Heart need not with none other happiness,
        But here on earth to have such heaven's bliss.

LXXIII

    Being myself captured here in care,
        My heart, whom none with servile bands can tie,
        But the fair tresses of your golden hair,
        Breaking his prison forth to you doth fly.
    Like as a bird that in one's hand doth spy
        Desired food, to it doth make his flight:
        Even so my heart, that wont on your fair eye
        To feed his fill, flys back unto your sight.
    Do you him take, and in your bosom bright,
        Gently encage, that he may be your thrall:
        Perhaps he there may learn with rare delight,
        To sing your name and praises over all.
    That it hereafter may you not repent,
        Him lodging in your bosom to have lent.

LXXIV

    Most happy letters fram'd by skillful trade,
        With which that happy name was first designed:
        The which three times thrice happy hath me made,
        With gifts of body, fortune and of mind.
    The first my being to me gave by kind,
        From mother's womb deriv'd by due descent,
        The second is my sovereign Queen most kind,
        That honour and large riches to me lent.
    The third my love, my life's last ornament,
        By whom my spirit out of dust was raised:
        To speak her praise and glory excellent,
        Of all alive most worthy to be praised.
    Ye three Elizabeths forever live,
        That three such graces did unto me give.

LXXV

    One day I wrote her name upon the strand,
        But came the waves and washed it away:
        Again I wrote it with a second hand,
        But came the tide, and made my pains his prey.
    Vain man, said she, that doest in vain assay,
        A mortal thing so to immortalize,
        For I myself shall like to this decay,
        And eek my name be wiped out likewise.
    No so, (quod I) let baser things devise
        To die in dust, but you shall live by fame:
        My verse, your virtues rare shall eternize,
        And in the heavens write your glorious name.
    Where whenas death shall all the world subdue,
        Out love shall live, and later life renew.

LXXVI

    Fair bosom fraught with virtue's riches treasure,
        The nest of love, the lodging of delight:
        The bower of bliss, the paradise of pleasure,
        The sacred harbour of that heavenly sprite.
    How was I ravished with your lovely sight,
        And my frail thoughts too rashly led astray?
        Whiles diving deep through amorous insight,
        On the sweet spoil of beauty they did prey.
    And twixt her paps like early fruit in May,
        Whose harvest seemed to hasten now apace:
        They loosly did their wanton wings display,
        And there to rest themselves did boldly place.
    Sweet thoughts I envy your so happy rest,
        Which oft I wished, yet never was so blest.

LXXVII

    Was it a dream, or did I see it plain,
        A goodly table of pure ivory:
        All spread with juncats, fit to entertain
        The greatest prince with pompous royalty.
    'Mongst which there in a silver dish did lie
        Two golden apples of unvalued price:
        Far passing those which Hercules came by,
        Or those which Atalanta did entice.
    Exceeding sweet, yet void of sinful vice,
        That many sought yet none could ever taste,
        Sweet fruit of pleasure brought from paradise
        By love himself, and in his garden placed.
    Her breast that table was so richly spread,
        My thoughts the guests, which would thereon have fed.

LXXVIII

    Lacking my love I go from place to place,
        Like a young fawn that late hath lost the hind:
        And seek each where, where last I saw her face,
        Whose image yet I carry fresh in mind.
    I seek the fields with her late footing signed,
        I seek her bower with her late presence decked,
        Yet nor in field nor bower I her can find:
        Yet field and bower are full of her aspect.
    But when mine eyes I thereunto direct,
        They idly back return to me again,
        And when I hope to see their true object,
        I find myself but fed with fancies vain.
    Cease then mine eyes, to seek herself to see,
        And let my thoughts behold herself in me.

LXXIX

    Men call you fair, and you do credit it,
        For that yourself ye daily such do see:
        But the true fair, that is the gentle wit,
        And virtuous mind, is much more prayed of me.
    For all the rest, how ever fair it be,
        Shall turn to naught and loose that glorious hue:
        But only that is permanent and free
        From frail corruption, that doth flesh ensue.
    That is true beauty: that doth argue you
        To be divine and born of heavenly seed:
        Deriv'd from that fair spirit, from whom all true
        And perfect beauty did at first proceed.
    He only fair, and what he fair hath made,
        All other fair like flowers untimely fade.

LXXX

    After so long a race as I have run
        Through Faery land, which those six books compile,
        Give leave to rest me being half fordone,
        And gather to myself new breath awhile.
    Then as a steed refreshed after toil,
        Out of my prison I will break anew:
        And stoutly will that second work assoyle,
        With strong endeavor and attention due.
    Till then give leave to me in pleasant mew,
        To sport my muse and sing my love's sweet praise:
        The contemplation of whose heavenly hue,
        My spirit to an higher pitch will raise.
    But let her praises yet be low and mean,
        Fit for the handmaid of the Faery Queene.

LXXXI

    Fair is my love, when her fair golden heares,
        With the loose wind ye waving chance to mark:
        Fair when the rose in her red cheeks appears,
        Or in her eyes the fire of love does spark.
    Fair when her breast like a rich-laden bark,
        With precious merchandise she forth doth lay:
        Fair when that cloud of pride, which oft doth dark
        Her goodly light with smiles she drives away.
    But fairest she, when so she doth display,
        The gate with pearls and rubies richly dight:
        Through which her words so wise do make their way
        To bear the message of her gentle sprite.
    The rest be works of nature's wonderment,
        But this the work of heart's astonishment.

LXXXII

    Joy of my life, full oft for loving you
        I bless my lot, that was so lucky placed:
        But then the more your own mishap I rue,
        That are so much by so mean love debased.
    For had the equal heavens so much you graced
        In this as in the rest, ye mote invent
        Soom heavenly wit, whose verse could have enchased
        Your glorious name in golden monument.
    But since ye deigned so goodly to relent
        To me your thrall, in whom is little worth,
        That little that I am, shall all be spent,
        In setting your immoral praises forth.
    Whose lofty argument uplifting me,
        Shall lift you up unto an high degree.

LXXXIII

    My hungry eyes, through greedy covetize,
        Still to behold the object of their pain:
        With no contentment can themselves suffice.
        But having pine, and having not complain.
    For lacking it, they cannot life sustain,
        And seeing it, they gaze on it the more:
        In their amazement like Narcissus vain
        Whose eyes him starv'd: so plenty makes me poor.
    Yet are mine eyes so filled with the store
        Of that fair sight, that nothing else they brook:
        But loath the things which they did like before,
        And can no more endure on them to look.
    All this world's glory seemeth vain to me,
        And all their shows but shadows, saving she.

LXXXIV

    Let not one spark of filthy lustfull fire
        Ne one light glance of sensual desire
        Attempt to work her gentle mind's unrest.
    But pure affections bred in spotless breast,
        And modest thoughts breathed from well tempered sprites
        Go visit her in her chaste bower of rest,
        Accompanied with angelic delights.
    There fill yourself with those most joyous sights,
        The which myself could never yet attain:
        But speak no word to her of these sad plights,
        Which her too constant stiffness doth constrain.
    Only behold her rare perfection,
        And bless your fortune's fair election.

LXXXV

    The world that cannot deem of worthy things,
        When I do praise her, say I do but flatter:
        So does the cuckoo, when the mavis sings,
        Begin his witless note apace to clatter.
    But they that skill not of so heavenly matter,
        All that they know not, envy or admire,
        Rather than envy let them wonder at her,
        But not to deem of her desert aspire.
    Deep in the closet of my parts entire,
        Her worth is written with a golden quill:
        That me with heavenly fury doth inspire,
        And my glad mouth with her sweet praises fill.
    Which when as fame in her shrill trump shall thunder
        Let the world choose to envy or to wonder.

LXXXVI

    Venemous tongue, tipped with vile adders' sting,
        Of that self kind with which the Furies fell
        Their snaky heads do comb, from which a spring
        Of poisoned words and spiteful speeches well.
    Let all the plagues and horrid pains of hell,
        Upon thee fall for thine accursed hire:
        That with false-forged lies, which thou didst tell,
        In my true love did stir up coals of ire,
    The sparks whereof let kindle thine own fire,
        And catching hold on thine own wicked head
        Consume thee quite, that didst with guile conspire
        In my sweet peace such breaches to have bred.
    Shame be thy meed, and mischief thy reward,
        Due to thyself that it for me prepared.

LXXXVII

    Since I did leave the presence of my love,
        Many long weary days have I outworn:
        And many nights, that slowly seemed to move
        Their sad protract from evening until morn.
    For when as day the heaven doth adorn,
        I wish that night the noyous day would end:
        And when as night hath us of light forlorn,
        I wish that day would shortly reascend.
    Thus I the time with expectation spend,
        And fain my grief with changes to beguile,
        That further seems his term still to extend,
        And maketh every minute seem a mile.
    So sorrow still doth seem too long to last,
        But joyous hours do fly away too fast.

LXXXVIII

    Since I have lacked the comfort of that light,
        The which was wont to lead my thoughts astray:
        I wander as in darkness of the night,
        Afraid of every danger's least dismay.
    Ne ought I see, though in the clearest day,
        When others gaze upon their shadows vain:
        But th'only image of that heavenly ray,
        Whereof some glance doth in mine eye remain.
    Of which beholding the idea plain,
        Through contemplation of my purest part:
        With light thereof I do myself sustain,
        And thereon feed my love-afamished heart.
    But with such brightness whilst I fill my mind,
        I starve my body and mine eyes do blind.

LXXXIX

    Like as the culver on the bared bough,
        Sits mourning for the absence of her mate,
        And in her songs sends many a wishful vow,
        For his return that seems to linger late.
    So I alone now left disconsolate,
        Mourn to myself the absence of my love:
        And wandering here and there all desolate,
        Seek with my plaints to match that mournful dove:
    Ne joy of aught that under heaven doth hove,
        Can comfort me, but her own joyous sight:
        Whose sweet aspect both God and man can move,
        In her unspotted pleasauns to delight.
    Dark is my day, while her fair light I miss,
        And dead my life that wants such lively bliss.


here in this valley of discrete academies
we have not mountains, but mounts, truncated hillocks
to the adirondacks, to northern monadnock,
themselves mere rocky hillocks to an everest
still, theyre out best mustering of height by
comparison with the sunnken silver-grizzled
back of the connecticut, the river-level
flats of hadley farms, theyre lofty enough
elevations to be called something more than hills
green, wholly green, they stand their knobby spine
against our sky they are what we look southward to
up pleasant street at main poising their shapes
between the snuff and red tar-paper apartments,
they mound a summer coolness in our view
to people who live in the bottom of valleys
a rise in the landscape, hummock or hogback, looks
to be meant for climbing a peculiar logic
in going up for the coming down if the post
we start ats the same post we finish by,
but its the clear conversion at the top can hold
us to the oblique road, in spite of a fitful
wish for even ground, and its the last cliff
ledge will dislodge out cramped concept of space, unwall
horizons beyond vision, spill vision
after the horizons, stretching the narrowed eye
to full capacity we climb to hopes
of such seeing up the leaf-shuttered escarpments,
blindered by green, under a green-grained sky
into the blue tops define themselves as places
where nothing highers to be looked to downward looks
follow the black arrow-backs of swifts on their track
of the air eddies loop and arc though airs at rest
to us, since we see no leaf edge stir high
here on a mount overlaid with leaves the paint-peeled
hundred-year-old hotel sustains its ramshackle
four-way veranda, view-keeping above
the fallen timbers of its once remarkable
funicular railway, witness to gone
time, and to graces gone with the time a state view-
keeper collects half-dollars for the slopes
of state scenery, sells soda, shows off viewpoints
a ruffy skylight oaints the gray oxbow
and paints the rivers pale circumfluent stillness
as roses broach their carmine in a mirror flux
of the desultory currents --- all that unique
stripple of shifting wave-tips is ironed out, lost
in the simplified orderings of sky-
lorded perspectives maplike, the far fields are ruled
by correct green lines and no seedy free-for-all
of asparagus heads cars run their suave
colored beads on the strung roads, and the people stroll
straightforwardly across the springing green
alls peace and discipline down there till lately we
lived under the shadow of hot rooftops
and never saw how coolly we might move for once
a high hush quietens the crickets cry
the smile of iceboxes annihilates me
such blue currents in the veins of my loved one
i hear her great heart purr
from her lips ampersands and percent signs
exit like kisses
it is monday in her mind morals
launder and present themselves
what am i to make of these contradictions?
i wear white cuffs, i bow
is this love then, this red material
issuing from the steele needle that flies so blindingly?
it will make little dresses and coats,
it will cover a dynasty
how her body opens and shuts-
a swiss watch, jeweled in the hinges
o heart, such disorganization
the stars are flashing like terrible numerals
abc, her eyelids say
spry, wry, and gray as these march sticks,
percy bows, in his blue peajacket, among the narcissi
he is recuperating from something on the lung
the narcissi, too, are bowing to some big thing
it rattles their stars on the green hill where percy
nurses the hardship of his stitches, and walks and walks
there is a dignity to this there is a formality-
the flowers vivid as bandages, and the man mending
they bow and stand  they suffer such attacks
and the octogenarian loves the little flocks
he is quite blue the terrible wind tries his breathing
the narcissi look up like children, quickly and whitely
clocks cry stillness is a lie, my dear
the wheels revolve, the universe keeps running
proud you halt upon the spiral stair
the asteroids turn traitor in the air,
and planets plot with old elliptic cunning
clocks cry stillness is a lie, my dear
red the unraveled rose sings in your hair
blood springs eternal if the heart be burning
proud you halt upon the spiral stair
cryptic stars wind up the atmosphere,
in solar schemes the titled suns go turning
clocks cry stillness is a lie, my dear
loud the immortal nightingales declare
love flames forever if the flesh be yearning
proud you halt upon the spiral stair
circling zodiac compels the year
intolerant beauty never will be learning
clocks cry stillness is a lie, my dear
proud you halt upon the spiral stair
love set you going like a fat gold watch
the midwife slapped your footsoles, and your bald cry
took its place among the elements
our voices echo, magnifying your arrival  new statue
in a drafty museum, your nakedness
shadows our safety  we stand round blankly as walls
im no more your mother
than the cloud that distills a mirror to reflect its own slow
effacement at the winds hand
all night your moth-breath
flickers among the flat pink roses  i wake to listen
a far sea moves in my ear
one cry, and i stumble from bed, cow-heavy and floral
in my victorian nightgown
your mouth opens clean as a cats  the window square
whitens and swallows its dull stars  and now you try
your handful of notes
the clear vowels rise like balloons
old man, you surface seldom
then you come in with the tides
coming
when seas wash cold, foam-
capped white hair, white beard,
far-flung,
a dragnet, rising, falling, as waves
crest and trough miles long
extend the radial sheaves
of your spread hair, in which wrin-
kling skeins
knotted, caught, survives
the old myth of orgins
unimaginable you float near
as kneeled ice-mountains
of the north, to be steered clear
of, not fathomed all obscurity
starts with a danger
your dangers are many i
cannot look much but your form
suffers
some strange injury
and seems to die so vapors
ravel to clearness on the dawn sea
the muddy rumors
of your burial move me
to half-believe your reappearance
proves rumors shallow,
for the archaic trenched lines
of your grained face shed time in
runnels
ages beat like rains
on the unbeaten channels
of the ocean such sage humor
and
durance are whirlpools
to make away with the ground-
work of the earth and the skys
ridgepole
waist down, you may wind
one labyrinthine tangle
to root deep among knuckles, shin-
bones,
skulls inscrutable,
below shoulders not once
seen by any man who kept his head,
you defy questions
you defy godhood
i walk dry on your kingdoms border
exiled to no good
your shelled bed i remember
father, this thick air is murderous
i would breathe water
arena dust rusted by four bulls blood to a dull redness,
the afternoon at a bad end under the crowds truculence,
the ritual death each time botched among dropped capes, ill-judged
stabs,
the strongest will seemed a will towards ceremony obese, dark-
faced in his rich yellows, tassels, pompons, braid, the picador
rode out against the fifth bull to brace his pike and slowly bear
down deep into the bent bull-neck cumbrous routine, not artwork
instinct for art began with the bulls horn lofting in the mobs
hush a lumped man-shape the whole act formal, fluent as a dance
blood faultlessly broached redeemed the sullied air, the earths grossness
now coldness comes sifting down, layer after layer,
to our bower at the lily root
overhead the old umbrellas of summer
wither like pithless hands there is little shelter
hourly the eye of the sky enlarges its blank
dominion the stars are no nearer
already frog-mouth and fish-mouth drink
the liquor of indolence, and all thing sink
into a soft caul of forgetfulness
the fugitive colors die
caddis worms drowse in their silk cases,
the lamp-headed nymphs are nodding to sleep like statues
puppets, loosed from the strings of the puppetmaster
wear masks of horn to bed
this is not death, it is something safer
the wingy myths wont tug at us anymore
the molts are tongueless that sang from above the water
of golgotha at the tip of a reed,
and how a god flimsy as a babys finger
shall unhusk himself and steer into the air
he, hunger-strung, hard to slake,
so fitted is for my black luck
with heat such as no man could have
and yet keep kind
that all merits in being meat
seasoned how hed most approve
bloods broth
filched by his hand,
choice wassail makes, cooked hot,
cupped quick to mouth
though prime parts cram each rich meal,
hell not spare
nor scant his want until
sacked larders gone bone-bare
all day she plays at chess with the bones of the world
favored while suddenly the rains begin
beyond the window she lies on cushions curled
and nibbles an occasional bonbon of sin
prim, pink-breasted, feminine, she nurses
chocolate fancies in rose-papered rooms
where polished higboys whisper creaking curses
and hothouse roses shed immortal blooms
the garnets on her fingers twinkle quick
and blood reflects across the manuscript
she muses on the odor, sweet and sick,
of festering gardenias in a crypt,
and lost in subtle metaphor, retreats
from gray child faces crying in the streets
mother, mother, what illbred aunt
or what disfigured and unsightly
cousin did you so unwisely keep
unasked to my christening, that she
sent these ladies in her stead
with heads like darning-eggs to nod
and nod and nod at foot and head
and at the left side of my crib?
mother, who made to order stories
of mixie blackshort the heroic bear,
mother, whose witches always, always,
got baked into gingerbread, i wonder
whether you saw them, whether you said
words to rid me of those three ladies
nodding by night around my bed,
mouthless, eyeless, with stitched bald head
in the hurricane, when fathers twelve
study windows bellied in
like bubbles about to break, you fed
my brother and me cookies and ovaltine
and helped the two of us to choir
thor is angry boom boom boom
thor is angry we dont care
but those ladies broke the panes
when on tiptoe the schoolgirls danced,
blinking flashlights like fireflies
and singing the glowworm song, i could
not lift a foot in the twinkle-dress
but, heavy-footed, stood aside
in the shadow cast by my dismal-headed
godmothers, and you cried and cried
and the shadow stretched, the lights went out
mother, you sent me to piano lessons
and praised my arabesques and trills
although each teacher found my touch
oddly wooden in spite of scales
and the hours of practicing, my ear
tone-deaf and yes, unteachable
i learned, i learned, i learned elsewhere,
from muses unhired by you, dear mother,
i woke one day to see you, mother,
floating above me in bluest air
on a green balloon bright with a million
flowers and bluebirds that never were
never, never, found anywhere
but the little planet bobbed away
like a soap-bubble as you called come here
and i faced my traveling companions
day now, night now, at head, side, feet,
they stand their vigil in gowns of stone,
faces blank as the day i was born,
their shadows long in the setting sun
that never brightens or goes down
and this is the kingdom you bore me to,
mother, mother but no frown of mine
will betray the company i keep
how far is it?
how far is it now?
the gigantic gorilla interior
of the wheels move, they appall me ---
the terrible brains
of krupp, black muzzles
revolving, the sound
punching out absence like cannon
it is russia i have to get across, it is some was or other
i am dragging my body
quietly through the straw of the boxcars
now is the time for bribery
what do wheels eat, these wheels
fixed to their arcs like gods,
the silver leash of the will ----
inexorable and their pride
all the gods know destinations
i am a letter in this slot
i fly to a name, two eyes
will there be fire, will there be bread?
here there is such mud
it is a trainstop, the nurses
undergoing the faucet water, its veils, veils in a nunnery,
touching their wounded,
the men the blood still pumps forward,
legs, arms piled outside
the tent of unending cries ----
a hospital of dolls
and the men, what is left of the men
pumped ahead by these pistons, this blood
into the next mile,
the next hour ----
dynasty of broken arrows
how far is it?
there is mud on my feet,
thick, red and slipping it is adams side,
this earth i rise from, and i in agony
i cannot undo myself, and the train is steaming
steaming and breathing, its teeth
ready to roll, like a devils
there is a minute at the end of it
a minute, a dewdrop
how far is it?
it is so small
the place i am getting to, why are there these obstacles ----
the body of this woman,
charred skirts and deathmask
mourned by religious figures, by garlanded children
and now detonations ----
thunder and guns
the fires between us
is there no place
turning and turning in the middle air,
untouchable and untouchable
the train is dragging itself, it is screaming ----
an animal
insane for the destination,
the bloodspot,
the face at the end of the flare
i shall bury the wounded like pupas,
i shall count and bury the dead
let their souls writhe in like dew,
incense in my track
the carriages rock, they are cradles
and i, stepping from this skin
of old bandages, boredoms, old faces
step up to you from the black car of lethe,
pure as a baby
this is a dark house, very big
i made it myself,
cell by cell from a quiet corner,
chewing at the grey paper,
oozing the glue drops,
whistling, wiggling my ears,
thinking of something else
it has so many cellars,
such eelish delvings
u an round as an owl,
i see by my own light
any day i may litter puppies
or mother a horse my belly moves
i must make more maps
these marrowy tunnels
moley-handed, i eat my way
all-mouth licks up the bushes
and the pots of meat
he lives in an old well,
a stoney hole hes to blame
hes a fat sort
pebble smells, turnipy chambers
small nostrils are breathing
little humble loves
footlings, boneless as noses,
it is warm and tolerable
in the bowel of the root
heres a cuddly mother
always in the middle of a kiss
came the profane stimulus to cough
always from teh pulpit during service
leaned the devil prompting you to laugh
behind mock-ceremony of your grief
lurked the burlesque instinct of the ham
you never altered your amused belief
that life was a mere monumental sham
from the comic accident of birth
to the final grotesque joke of death
your malady of sacrilegious mirth
spread gay contagion with each clever breath
now you must play the straight man for a term
and tolerate the humor of the worm
now we, returning from the vaulted domes
of our colossal sleep, come home to find
a tall metropolis of catacombs
erected down the gangways of our mind
green alleys where we reveled have become
the infernal haunt of demon dangers
both seraph song and violins are dumb
each clock tick consecrates the death of strangers
backward we traveled to reclaim the day
before we fell, like icarus, undone
all we find are altars in decay
and profane words scrawled black across the sun
still, stubbornly we try to crack the nut
in which the riddle of our race is shut
outside in the street i hear
a car door slam voices coming near
incoherent scraps of talk
and high heels clicking up the walk
the doorbell rends the noonday heat
with copper claws
a seconds pause
the dull drums of my pulses beat
against a silence wearing thin
the door now opens from within
oh, hear the clash of people meeting ---
the laughter and the screams of greeting
fat always, and out of breath,
a greasy smack on every cheek
from aunt elizabeth
there, thats the pink, pleased squeak
of cousin jane, out spinster with
the faded eyes
and hands like nervous butterflies
while rough as splintered wood
across them all
rasps the jarring baritone of uncle paul
the youngest nephew gives a fretful whine
and drools at the reception line
like a diver on a lofty spar of land
atop the flight of stairs i stand
a whirlpool leers at me,
i cast off my identity
and make the fatal plunge
the day you died i went into the dirt,
into the lightless hibernaculum
where bees, striped black and gold, sleep out the blizzard
like hieratic stones, and the ground is hard
it was good for twenty years, that wintering -
as if you never existed, as if i came
god-fathered into the world from my mothers belly
her wide bed wore the stain of divinity
i had nothing to do with guilt or anything
when i wormed back under my mothers heart
small as a doll in my dress of innocence
i lay dreaming your epic, image by image
nobody died or withered on that stage
everything took place in a durable whiteness
the day i woke, i woke on churchyard hill
i found your name, i found your bones and all
enlisted in a cramped stone askew by an iron fence
in this charity ward, this poorhouse, where the dead
crowd foot to foot, head to head, no flower
breaks the soil this is azalea path
a field of burdock opens to the south
six feet of yellow gravel cover you
the artificial red sage does not stir
in the basket of plastic evergreens they put
at the headstone next to yours, nor does it rot,
although the rains dissolve a bloody dye
the ersatz petals drip, and they drip red
another kind of redness bothers me
the day your slack sail drank my sisters breath
the flat sea purpled like that evil cloth
my mother unrolled at your last homecoming
i borrow the silts of an old tragedy
the truth is, one late october, at my birth-cry
a scorpion stung its head, an ill-starred thing
my mother dreamed you face down in the sea
the stony actors poise and pause for breath
i brought my love to bear, and then you died
it was the gangrene ate you to the bone
my mother said you died like any man
how shall i age into that state of mind?
i am the ghost of an infamous suicide,
my own blue razor rusting at my throat
o pardon the one who knocks for pardon at
your gate, father - your hound-bitch, daughter, friend
it was my love that did us both to death
how the elements solidify ---
the moonlight, that chalk cliff
in whose rift we lie
back to back i here an owl cry
from its cold indigo
intolerable vowels enter my heart
the child in the white crib revolves and sighs,
opens its mouth now, demanding
his little face is carved in pained, red wood
then there are the stars - ineradicable, hard
one touch  it burns and sickens
i cannot see your eyes
where apple bloom ices the night
i walk in a ring,
a groove of old faults, deep and bitter
love cannot come here
a black gap discloses itself
on the opposite lip
a small white soul is waving, a small white maggot
my limbs, also, have left me
who has dismembered us?
the dark is melting we touch like cripples
what a thrill ---
my thumb instead of an onion
the top quite gone
except for a sort of a hinge
of skin,
a flap like a hat,
dead white
then that red plush
little pilgrim,
the indians axed your scalp
your turkey wattle
carpet rolls
straight from the heart
i step on it,
clutching my bottle
of pink fizz
a celebration, this is
out of a gap
a million soldiers run,
redcoats, every one
whose side are they on?
o my
homunculus, i am ill
i have taken a pill to kill
the thin
papery feeling
saboteur,
kamikaze man ---
the stain on your
gauze ku klux klan
babushka
darkens and tarnishes and when
the balled
pulp of your heart
confronts its small
mill of silence
how you jump ---
trepanned veteran,
dirty girl,
thumb stump
in benidorm there are melons,
whole donkey-carts full
of innumerable melons,
ovals and balls,
bright green and thumpable
laced over with stripes
of turtle-dark green
chooose an egg-shape, a world-shape,
bowl one homeward to taste
in the whitehot noon
cream-smooth honeydews,
pink-pulped whoppers,
bump-rinded cantaloupes
with orange cores
each wedge wears a studding
of blanched seeds or black seeds
to strew like confetti
under the feet of
this market of melon-eating
fiesta-goers
gold mouths cry with the green young
certainty of the bronze boy
remembering a thousand autumns
and how a hundred thousand leaves
came sliding down his shoulder blades
persuaded by his bronze heroic reason
we ignore the coming doom of gold
and we are glad in this bright metal season
even the dead laugh among the goldenrod
the bronze boy stands kneedeep in centuries,
and never grieves,
remembering a thousand autumns,
with sunlight of a thousand years upon his lips
and his eyes gone blind with leaves
thou shalt have an everlasting
monday and stand in the moon
the moons man stands in his shell,
bent under a bundle
of sticks the light falls chalk and cold
upon our bedspread
his teeth are chattering among the leprous
peaks and craters of those extinct volcanoes
he also against black frost
would pick sticks, would not rest
until his own lit room outshone
sundays ghost of sun
now works his hell of mondays in the moons ball,
fireless, seven chill seas chained to his ankle
i have done it again
one year in every ten
i manage it--
a sort of walking miracle, my skin
bright as a nazi lampshade,
my right foot
a paperweight,
my face featureless, fine
jew linen
peel off the napkin
o my enemy
do i terrify?--
the nose, the eye pits, the full set of teeth?
the sour breath
will vanish in a day
soon, soon the flesh
the grave cave ate will be
at home on me
and i a smiling woman
i am only thirty
and like the cat i have nine times to die
this is number three
what a trash
to annihilate each decade
what a million filaments
the peanut-crunching crowd
shoves in to see
them unwrap me hand and foot--
the big strip tease
gentlemen, ladies
these are my hands
my knees
i may be skin and bone,
nevertheless, i am the same, identical woman
the first time it happened i was ten
it was an accident
the second time i meant
to last it out and not come back at all
i rocked shut
as a seashell
they had to call and call
and pick the worms off me like sticky pearls
dying
is an art, like everything else
i do it exceptionally well
i do it so it feels like hell
i do it so it feels real
i guess you could say ive a call
its easy enough to do it in a cell
its easy enough to do it and stay put
its the theatrical
comeback in broad day
to the same place, the same face, the same brute
amused shout
a miracle
that knocks me out
there is a charge
for the eyeing of my scars, there is a charge
for the hearing of my heart--
it really goes
and there is a charge, a very large charge
for a word or a touch
or a bit of blood
or a piece of my hair or my clothes
so, so, herr doktor
so, herr enemy
i am your opus,
i am your valuable,
the pure gold baby
that melts to a shriek
i turn and burn
do not think i underestimate your great concern
ash, ash--
you poke and stir
flesh, bone, there is nothing there--
a cake of soap,
a wedding ring,
a gold filling
herr god, herr lucifer
beware
beware
out of the ash
i rise with my red hair
and i eat men like air
viciousness in the kitchen
the potatoes hiss
it is all hollywood, windowless,
the fluorescent light wincing on and off like a terrible migraine,
coy paper strips for doors
stage curtains, a widows frizz
and i, love, am a pathological liar,
and my child look at her, face down on the floor,
little unstrung puppet, kicking to disappear
why she is schizophrenic,
her face is red and white, a panic,
you have stuck her kittens outside your window
in a sort of cement well
where they crap and puke and cry and she cant hear
you say you cant stand her,
the bastards a girl
you who have blown your tubes like a bad radio
clear of voices and history, the staticky
noise of the new
you say i should drown the kittens their smell
you say i should drown my girl
shell cut her throat at ten if shes mad at two
the baby smiles, fat snail,
from the polished lozenges of orange linoleum
you could eat him hes a boy
you say your husband is just no good to you
his jew-mama guards his sweet sex like a pearl
you have one baby, i have two
i should sit on a rock off cornwall and comb my hair
i should wear tiger pants, i should have an affair
we should meet in another life, we should meet in air,
me and you
meanwhile theres a stink of fat and baby crap
im doped and thick from my last sleeping pill
the smog of cooking, the smog of hell
floats our heads, two venemous opposites,
our bones, our hair
i call you orphan, orphan you are ill
the sun gives you ulcers, the wind gives you tb
once you were beautiful
in new york, in hollywood, the men said through?
gee baby, you are rare
you acted, acted for the thrill
the impotent husband slumps out for a coffee
i try to keep him in,
an old pole for the lightning,
the acid baths, the skyfuls off of you
he lumps it down the plastic cobbled hill,
flogged trolley the sparks are blue
the blue sparks spill,
splitting like quartz into a million bits
o jewel o valuable
that night the moon
dragged its blood bag, sick
animal
up over the harbor lights
and then grew normal,
hard and apart and white
the scale-sheen on the sand scared me to death
we kept picking up handfuls, loving it,
working it like dough, a mulatto body,
the silk grits
a dog picked up your doggy husband he went on
now i am silent, hate
up to my neck,
thick, thick
i do not speak
i am packing the hard potatoes like good clothes,
i am packing the babies,
i am packing the sick cats
o vase of acid,
it is love you are full of you know who you hate
he is hugging his ball and chain down by the gate
that opens to the sea
where it drives in, white and black,
then spews it back
every day you fill him with soul-stuff, like a pitcher
you are so exhausted
your voice my ear-ring,
flapping and sucking, blood-loving bat
that is that that is that
you peer from the door,
sad hag every womans a whore
i cant communicate
i see your cute decor
close on you like the fist of a baby
or an anemone, that sea
sweetheart, that kleptomaniac
i am still raw
i say i may be back
you know what lies are for
even in your zen heaven we shant meet
this man makes a pseudonym
and crawls behind it like a worm
this woman on the telephone
says she is a man, not a woman
the mask increases, eats the worm,
stripes for mouth and eyes and nose,
the voice of the woman hollows---
more and more like a dead one,
worms in the glottal stops
she hates
the thought of a baby---
stealer of cells, stealer of beauty---
she would rather be dead than fat,
dead and perfect, like nefertit,
hearing the fierce mask magnify
the silver limbo of each eye
where the child can never swim,
where there is only him and him
pocket watch, i tick well
the streets are lizardy crevices
sheer-sided, with holes where to hide
it is best to meet in a cul-de-sac,
a palace of velvet
with windows of mirrors
there one is safe,
there are no family photographs,
no rings through the nose, no cries
bright fish hooks, the smiles of women
gulp at my bulk
and i, in my snazzy blacks,
mill a litter of breasts like jellyfish
to nourish
the cellos of moans i eat eggs -
eggs and fish, the essentials,
the aphrodisiac squid
my mouth sags,
the mouth of christ
when my engine reaches the end of it
the tattle of my
gold joints, my way of turning
bitches to ripples of silver
rolls out a carpet, a hush
and there is no end, no end of it
i shall never grow old new oysters
shriek in the sea and i
glitter like fontainebleau
gratified,
all the fall of water and eye
over whose pool i tenderly
lean and see me
we came over the moor-top
through air streaming and green-lit,
stone farms foundering in it,
valleys of grass altering
in a light neither dawn
nor nightfall, out hands, faces
lucent as percelain, the earths
claim and weight gone out of them
some such transfiguring moved
the eight pilgrims towards its source--
toward the great jewel shown often,
never given hidden, yet
simultaneously seen
on moor-top, at sea-bottom,
knowable only by light
other than noon, that moon, stars ---
the once-known way becoming
wholly other, and ourselves
estranged, changed, suspended where
angels are rumored, clearly
floating , among the floating
tables and chairs gravitys
lost in the lift and drift of
an easier element
than earth, and there is nothing
so fine we cannot do it
but nearing means distancing
at the common homecoming
light withdraws chairs, tables drop
down the body weighs like stone
it is no night to drown in
a full moon, river lapsing
black beneath bland mirror-sheen,
the blue water-mists dropping
scrim after scrim like fishnets
though fishermen are sleeping,
the massive castle turrets
doubling themselves in a glass
all stillness yet these shapes float
up toward me, troubling the face
of quiet from the nadir
they rise, their limbs ponderous
with richness, hair heavier
than sculptured marble they sing
of a world more full and clear
than can be sisters, your song
bears a burden too weighty
for the whorled ears listening
here, in a well-steered country,
under a balanced ruler
deranging by harmony
beyond the mundane order,
your voices lay siege you lodge
on the pitched reefs of nightmare,
promising sure harborage
by day, descant from borders
of hebetude, from the ledge
also of high windows worse
even than your maddening
song, your silence at the source
of your ice-hearted calling-
drunkenness of the great depths
o river, i see drifting
deep in your flux of silver
those great goddesses of peace
stone, stone, ferry me down there
kindness glides about my house
dame kindness, she is so nice
the blue and red jewels of her rings smoke
in the windows, the mirrors
are filling with smiles
what is so real as the cry of a child?
a rabbits cry may be wilder
but it has no soul
sugar can cure everything, so kindness says
sugar is a necessary fluid,
its crystals a little poultice
o kindness, kindness
sweetly picking up pieces
my japanese silks, desperate butterflies,
may be pinned any minute, anesthetized
and here you come, with a cup of tea
wreathed in steam
the blood jet is poetry,
there is no stopping it
you hand me two children, two roses
a villanelle
the sting of bees took away my father
who walked in a swarming shroud of wings
and scorned the tick of the falling weather
lightning licked in a yellow lather
but missed the mark with snaking fangs
the sting of bees too away my father
trouncing the sea like a ragin bather,
he rode the flood in a pride of prongs
and scorned the tick of the falling weather
a scowl of sun struck down my mother,
tolling her grave with golden gongs,
but the sting of bees took away my father
he counted the guns of god a bother,
laughed at the ambush of angels tongues,
and scorned the tick of the falling weather
o ransack the four winds and find another
man who can mangle the grin of kings
the sting of bees took away my father
who scorned the tick of the falling weather
the night is only a sort of carbon paper,
blueblack, with the much-poked periods of stars
letting in the light, peephole after peephole ---
a bonewhite light, like death, behind all things
under the eyes of the stars and the moons rictus
he suffers his desert pillow, sleeplessness
stretching its fine, irritating sand in all directions
over and over the old, granular movie
exposes embarrassments--the mizzling days
of childhood and adolescence, sticky with dreams,
parental faces on tall stalks, alternately stern and tearful,
a garden of buggy rose that made him cry
his forehead is bumpy as a sack of rocks
memories jostle each other for face-room like obsolete film stars
he is immune to pills red, purple, blue ---
how they lit the tedium of the protracted evening
those sugary planets whose influence won for him
a life baptized in no-life for a while,
and the sweet, drugged waking of a forgetful baby
now the pills are worn-out and silly, like classical gods
their poppy-sleepy colors do him no good
his head is a little interior of grey mirrors
each gesture flees immediately down an alley
of diminishing perspectives, and its significance
drains like water out the hole at the far end
he lives without privacy in a lidless room,
the bald slots of his eyes stiffened wide-open
on the incessant heat-lightning flicker of situations
nightlong, in the granite yard, invisible cats
have been howling like women, or damaged instruments
already he can feel daylight, his white disease,
creeping up with her hatful of trivial repetitions
the city is a map of cheerful twitters now,
and everywhere people, eyes mica-silver and blank,
are riding to work in rows, as if recently brainwashed
but i would rather be horizontal
i am not a tree with my root in the soil
sucking up minerals and motherly love
so that each march i may gleam into leaf,
nor am i the beauty of a garden bed
attracting my share of ahs and spectacularly painted,
unknowing i must soon unpetal
compared with me, a tree is immortal
and a flower-head not tall, but more startling,
and i want the ones longevity and the others daring
tonight, in the infinitesimallight of the stars,
the trees and the flowers have been strewing their cool odors
i walk among them, but none of them are noticing
sometimes i think that when i am sleeping
i must most perfectly resemble them--
thoughts gone dim
it is more natural to me, lying down
then the sky and i are in open conversation,
and i shall be useful when i lie down finally
then the trees may touch me for once, and the flowers have time for me
you bring me good news from the clinic,
whipping off your silk scarf, exhibiting the tight white
mummy-cloths, smiling im all right
when i was nine, a lime-green anesthetist
fed me banana gas through a frog-mask the nauseous vault
boomed wild bad dreams and the jovian voices of surgeons
the mother swam up, holding a tin basin
o i was sick
theyve changed all that traveling
nude as cleopatra in my well-boiled hospital shift,
fizzy with sedatives and unusually humorous,
i roll to an anteroom where a kind man
fists my fingers for me he makes me feel something precious
is leaking from the finger-vents at the count of two
darkness wipes me out like chalk on a blackboard
i dont know a thing
for five days i lie in secret,
tapped like a cask, the years draining into my pillow
even my best friend thinks im in the country
skin doesnt have roots, it peels away easy as paper
when i grin, the stitches tauten i grow backward im twenty,
broody and in long skirts on my first husbands sofa, my fingers
buried in the lambswool of the dead poodle
i hadnt a cat yet
now shes done for, the dewlapped lady
i watched settle, line by line, in my mirror ---
old sock-face, sagged on a darning egg
theyve trapped her in some laboratory jar
let her die there, or whither incessantly for the next fifty years,
nodding and rocking and fingering her thin hair
mother to myself, i wake swaddled in gauze,
pink and smooth as a baby
you will be aware of an absence, presently,
growing beside you, like a tree,
a death tree, color gone, an australian gum tree ---
balding, gelded by lightning--an illusion,
and a sky like a pigs backside, an utter lack of attention
but right now you are dumb
and i love your stupidity,
the blind mirror of it i look in
and find no face but my own, and you think thats funny
it is good for me
to have you grab my nose, a ladder rung
one day you may touch whats wrong ---
the small skulls, the smashed blue hills, the godawful hush
till then your smiles are found money
this was the lands end the last fingers, knuckled and rheumatic,
cramped on nothing black
admonitory cliffs, and the sea exploding
with no bottom, or anything on the other side of it,
whitened by the faces of the drowned
now it is only gloomy, a dump of rocks ---
leftover soldiers from old, messy wars
the sea cannons into their ear, but they dont budge
other rocks hide their grudges under the water
the cliffs are edged with trefoils, stars and bells
such as fingers might embroider, close to death,
almost too small for the mists to bother with
the mists are part of the ancient paraphernalia ---
souls, rolled in the doom-noise of the sea
they bruise the rocks out of existence, then resurrect them
they go up without hope, like sighs
i walk among them, and they stuff my mouth with cotton
when they free me, i am beaded with tears
our lady of the shipwrecked is striding toward the horizon,
her marble skirts blown back in two pink wings
a marble sailor kneels at her foot distractedly, and at his foot
a peasant woman in black
is praying to the monument of the sailor praying
our lady of the shipwrecked is three times life size,
her lips sweet with divinity
she does not hear what the sailor or the peasant is saying ---
she is in love with the beautiful formlessness of the sea
gull-colored laces flap in the sea drafts
beside the postcard stalls
the peasants anchor them with conches one is told
these are the pretty trinkets the sea hides,
little shells made up into necklaces and toy ladies
they do not come from with bay of the dead down there,
but from another place, tropical and blue,
we have never been to
these are our crepes eat them before they blow cold
empty, i echo to the least footfall,
museum without statues, grand with pillars, porticoes, rotundas
in my courtyard a fountain leaps and sinks back into itself,
nun-hearted and blind to the world marble lilies
exhale their pallor like scent
i imagine myself with a great public,
mother of a white nike and several bald-eyed apollos
insread, the dead injure me attentions, and nothing can happen
blank-faced and mum as a nurse
a garden of mouthings purple, scarlet-speckled, black
the great corollas dilate, peeling back their silks
their musk encroaches, circle after circle,
a well of scents almost too dense to breathe in
hieratical in your frock coat, maestro of the bees,
you move among the many-breasted hives,
my heart under your foot, sister of a stone
trumpet-throats open to the beaks of birds
the golden rain tree drips its powders down
in these little boudoirs streaked with orange and red
the anthers nod their heads, potent as kings
to father dynasties the air is rich
here is a queenship no mother can contest ---
a fruit thats death to taste dark flesh, dark parings
in burrows narrow as a finger, solitary bees
keep house among the grasses kneeling down
i set my eyes to a hole-mouth and meet an eye
round, green, disconsolate as a tear
father, bridegroom, in this easter egg
under the coronal of sugar roses
the queen bee marries the winter of your year
will they occur,
these people with torso of steel
winged elbows and eyeholes
awaiting masses
of cloud to give them expression,
these super-people -
and my baby a nail
driven, driven in
he shrieks in his grease
bones nosing for distance
and i, nearly extinct,
his three teeth cutting
themselves on my thumb -
and the star,
the old story
in the lane i meet sheep and wagons,
red earth, motherly blood
o you who eat
people like light rays, leave
this one
mirror safe, unredeemed
by the doves annihilation,
the glory
the power, the glory
this wood burns a dark
incense pale moss drips
in elbow-scarves, beards
from the archaic
bones of the great trees
blue mists move over
a lake thick with fish
snails scroll the border
of the glazed water
with coils of rams-horn
out in the open
down there the late year
hammers her rare and
various metals
old pewter roots twist
up from the jet-backed
mirror of water
and while the airs clear
hourglass sifts a
drift of goldpieces
bright waterlights are
sliding their quoits one
after the other
down boles of the fir
in sunless air, under pines
green to the point of blackness, some
founding father set these lobed, warped stones
to loom in the leaf-filtered gloom
black as the charred knuckle-bones
of a giant or extinct
animal, come from another
age, another planet surely flanked
by the orange and fuchsia bonfire
of azaleas, sacrosanct
these stones guard a dark repose
and keep their shapes intact while sun
alters shadows of rose and iris ---
long, short, long --- in the lit garden
and kindles a days-end blaze
colored to dull the pigment
of azaleas, yet burnt out
quick as they to follow the lights tint
and intensity by midnight
by noon and throughout the brunt
of various weathers is
to know the still heart of the stones
stones that take the whole summer to lose
their dream of the winters cold stones
warming at core only as
frost forms no mans crowbar could
uproot them their beards are ever-
green nor do they, once in a hundred
years, go down to drink the river
no thirst disturbs a stones bed
mayday  two came to field in such wise
a daisied mead, each said to each,
so were they one so sought they couch,
across barbed stile, through flocked brown cows
no pitchforked farmer, please, she said
may cockcrow guard us safe, said he
by blackthorn thicket, flower spray
they pitched their coats, come to green bed
below  a fen where water stood
aslant  their hill of stinging nettle
then, honor-bound, mute grazing cattle
above  leaf-wraithed white air, white cloud
all afternoon these lovers lay
until the sun turned pale from warm,
until sweet wind changed tune, blew harm
cruel nettles stung her angles raw
rueful, most vexed, that tender skin
should accept so fell a wound,
he stamped and cracked stalks to the ground
which had caused his dear girl pain
now he goes from his rightful road
and, under honor, will depart
while she stands burning, venom-girt,
in wait for sharper smart to fade
nobody in the lane, and nothing, nothing but blackberries,
blackberries on either side, though on the right mainly,
a blackberry alley, going down in hooks, and a sea
somewhere at the end of it, heaving blackberries
big as the ball of my thumb, and dumb as eyes
ebon in the hedges, fat
with blue-red juices these they squander on my fingers
i had not asked for such a blood sisterhood they must love me
they accommodate themselves to my milkbottle, flattening their sides
overhead go the choughs in black, cacophonous flocks ---
bits of burnt paper wheeling in a blown sky
theirs is the only voice, protesting, protesting
i do not think the sea will appear at all
the high, green meadows are glowing, as if lit from within
i come to one bush of berries so ripe it is a bush of flies,
hanging their bluegreen bellies and their wing panes in a chinese screen
the honey-feast of the berries has stunned them they believe in heaven
one more hook, and the berries and bushes end
the only thing to come now is the sea
from between two hills a sudden wind funnels at me,
slapping its phantom laundry in my face
these hills are too green and sweet to have tasted salt
i follow the sheep path between them a last hook brings me
to the hills northern face, and the face is orange rock
that looks out on nothing, nothing but a great space
of white and pewter lights, and a din like silversmiths
beating and beating at an intractable metal
what is this, behind this veil, is it ugly, is it beautiful?
it is shimmering, has it breasts, has it edges?
i am sure it is unique, i am sure it is what i want
when i am quiet at my cooking i feel it looking, i feel it thinking
is this the one i am too appear for,
is this the elect one, the one with black eye-pits and a scar?
measuring the flour, cutting off the surplus,
adhering to rules, to rules, to rules
is this the one for the annunciation?
my god, what a laugh
but it shimmers, it does not stop, and i think it wants me
i would not mind if it were bones, or a pearl button
i do not want much of a present, anyway, this year
after all i am alive only by accident
i would have killed myself gladly that time any possible way
now there are these veils, shimmering like curtains,
the diaphanous satins of a january window
white as babies bedding and glittering with dead breath o ivory
it must be a tusk there, a ghost column
can you not see i do not mind what it is
can you not give it to me?
do not be ashamed--i do not mind if it is small
do not be mean, i am ready for enormity
let us sit down to it, one on either side, admiring the gleam,
the glaze, the mirrory variety of it
let us eat our last supper at it, like a hospital plate
i know why you will not give it to me,
you are terrified
the world will go up in a shriek, and your head with it,
bossed, brazen, an antique shield,
a marvel to your great-grandchildren
do not be afraid, it is not so
i will only take it and go aside quietly
you will not even hear me opening it, no paper crackle,
no falling ribbons, no scream at the end
i do not think you credit me with this discretion
if you only knew how the veils were killing my days
to you they are only transparencies, clear air
but my god, the clouds are like cotton
armies of them they are carbon monoxide
sweetly, sweetly i breathe in,
filling my veins with invisibles, with the million
probable motes that tick the years off my life
you are silver-suited for the occasion o adding machine-----
is it impossible for you to let something go and have it go whole?
must you stamp each piece purple,
must you kill what you can?
there is one thing i want today, and only you can give it to me
it stands at my window, big as the sky
it breathes from my sheets, the cold dead center
where split lives congeal and stiffen to history
let it not come by the mail, finger by finger
let it not come by word of mouth, i should be sixty
by the time the whole of it was delivered, and to numb to use it
only let down the veil, the veil, the veil
if it were death
i would admire the deep gravity of it, its timeless eyes
i would know you were serious
there would be a nobility then, there would be a birthday
and the knife not carve, but enter
pure and clean as the cry of a baby,
and the universe slide from my side
on the stiff twig up there
hunches a wet black rook
arranging and rearranging its feathers in the rain
i do not expect a miracle
or an accident
to set the sight on fire
in my eye, not seek
any more in the desultory weather some design,
but let spotted leaves fall as they fall,
without ceremony, or portent
although, i admit, i desire,
occasionally, some backtalk
from the mute sky, i cant honestly complain
a certain minor light may still
leap incandescent
out of the kitchen table or chair
as if a celestial burning took
possession of the most obtuse objects now and then ---
thus hallowing an interval
otherwise inconsequent
by bestowing largesse, honor,
one might say love at any rate, i now walk
wary for it could happen
even in this dull, ruinous landscape sceptical,
yet politic ignorant
of whatever angel may choose to flare
suddenly at my elbow i only know that a rook
ordering its black feathers can so shine
as to seize my senses, haul
my eyelids up, and grant
a brief respite from fear
of total neutrality with luck,
trekking stubborn through this season
of fatigue, i shall
patch together a content
of sorts miracles occur,
if you care to call those spasmodic
tricks of radiance miracles the waits begun again,
the long wait for the angel
for that rare, random descent
the black bull bellowed before the sea
the sea, till that day orderly,
hove up against bendylaw
the queen in the mulberry arbor stared
stiff as a queen on a playing card
the king fingered his beard
a blue sea, four horny bull-feet,
a bull-snouted sea that wouldnt stay put,
bucked at the garden gate
along box-lined walks in the florid sun
toward the rowdy bellow and back again
the lords and ladies ran
the great bronze gate began to crack,
the sea broke in at every crack,
pellmell, blueblack
the bull surged up, the bull surged down,
not to be stayed by a daisy chain
nor by any learned man
o the kings tidy acre is under the sea,
and the royal rose in the bulls belly,
and the bull on the kings highway
two, of course there are two
it seems perfectly natural now ---
the one who never looks up, whose eyes are lidded
and balled? like blakes
who exhibits
the birthmarks that are his trademark ---
the scald scar of water,
the nude
verdigris of the condor
i am red meat his beak
claps sidewise i am not his yet
he tells me how badly i photograph
he tells me how sweet
the babies look in their hospital
icebox, a simple
frill at the neck
then the flutings of their ionian
death-gowns
then two little feet
he does not smile or smoke
the other does that
his hair long and plausive
bastard
masturbating a glitter
he wants to be loved
i do not stir
the frost makes a flower,
the dew makes a star,
the dead bell,
the dead bell
somebodys done for
two virtues ride, by stallion, by nag,
to grind our knives and scissors
lantern-jawed reason, squat common sense,
one courting doctors of all sorts,
one, housewives and shopkeepers
the trees are lopped, the poodles trim,
the laborers nails pared level
since those two civil servants set
their whetstone to the blunted edge
and minced the muddling devil
whose owl-eyes in the scraggly wood
scared mothers to miscarry,
drove the dogs to cringe and whine
and turned the farmboys temper wolfish,
the housewifes, desultory
in the rectory garden on his evening walk
paced brisk father shawn a cold day, a sodden one it was
in black novemeber after a sliding rain
dew stood in chill sweat on each stalk,
each thorn spiring from wet earth, a blue haze
hung caught in dark-webbed branches like a fabulous heron
hauled sudden from solitude,
hair prickling on his head,
father shawn perceived a ghost
shaping itself from that mist
how now, father shawn crisply addressed the ghost
wavering there, gauze-edged, smelling of woodsmoke,
what manner of business are you on?
from your blue pallor, id say you inhabited the frozen waste
of hell, and not the fiery part yet to judge by that dazzled look,
that noble mien, perhaps youve late quitted heaven?
in voice furred with frost,
ghost said to priest
neither of those countries do i frequent
earth is my haunt
come, come, father shawn gave an impatient shrug,
i dont ask you to spin some rridiculous fable
of gilded harps or gnawing fire simply tell
after your lifes end, what just epilogue
god ordained to follow up your days is it such trouble
to satisfy the questions of a curious old fool?
in life, love gnawed my skin
to this white bone
what love did then, love does now
gnaws me through
what love, asked father shawn, but too great love
of flawed earth-flesh could cause this sorry pass?
some damned condition you are in
thinking never to have left the world, you grieve
as though alive, shriveling in torment thus
to atone as shade for sin that lured blind man
the day of doom
is not yest come
until that time
a crock of dust is my dear hom
fond phantom, cried shocked father shawn,
can there be such stubbornness--
a soul grown feverish, clutching its dead body-tree
like a last storm-crossed leaf? best get you gone
to judgment in a higher court of grace
repent, depart, before gods trump-crack splits the sky
from that pale mist
ghost swore to priest
there sits no higher court
than mans red heart
the womb
rattles its pod, the moon
discharges itself from the tree with nowhere to go
my landscape is a hand with no lines,
the roads bunched to a knot,
the knot myself,
myself the rose you acheive---
this body,
this ivory
ungodly as a childs shriek
spiderlike, i spin mirrors,
loyal to my image,
uttering nothing but blood---
taste it, dark red
and my forest
my funeral,
and this hill and this
gleaming with the mouths of corpses
an old beast ended in this place
a monster of wood and rusty teeth
fire smelted his eyes to lumps
of pale blue vitreous stuff, opaque
as resin drops oozed from pine bark
the rafters and struts of his body wear
their char of karakul still i cant tell
how long his carcass had foundered under
the rubbish of summers, the black-leaved falls
now little weeds insinuate
soft suede tongues between his bones
his armorplate, his toppled stones
are an esplanade for crickets
i pick and pry like a doctor or
arch?ologist among
iron entrails, enameled bowl,
the coils and pipes that made him run
the small dell eats what ate it once
and yet the ichor of the spring
proceeds clear as it ever did
from the broken throat, that marshy lip
it flows off below the green and white
balustrade of a sag-backed bridge
leaning over, i encounter one
blue and improbable person
framed in a basketwork of cattails
o she is gracious and austere,
seated beneath the toneless water
it is not i, it is not i
no animal spoils on her green doorstep
and we shall never enter there
where the durable ones keep house
the stream that hustles us
neither nourishes nor heals
revolving in oval loops of solar speed,
couched in cauls of clay as in holy robes,
dead men render love and war no heed,
lulled in the ample womb of the full-tilt globe
no spiritual caesars are these dead
they want no proud paternal kingdom come
and when at last they blunder into bed
world-wrecked, they seek only oblivion
rolled round with goodly loam and cradled deep,
these bone shanks will not wake immaculate
to trumpet-toppling dawn of doomstruck day
they loll forever in colossal sleep
nor can gods stern, shocked angels cry them up
from their fond, final, infamous decay
gerd sits spindle-shaped in her dark tent,
lean face gone tawn with seasons ,
skin worn down to the knucklebones
at her tough trade without times taint
the burnished ball hangs fire in her hands, a lens
fusing times three horizons
two enter to tap her sight, a green pair
fresh leaved out in vows come tell
how we shall do together,
well or ill gerd slants a look at each most dear,
each to the other fit fiber for stern weather
slowly she spins the ball
i see two stalwart apple trees
coupled by branches intertwined
and, springing all about,
staunch saplings to this house, thriving days
will bring crops increase, and harvest fruit
follow on kind wind
no hardship then? he asks well take
whatever trials to come, so say true
his bride echoes his word at that,
gerd whirls the ball ablaze rough storm, she grunts,  may wreak
some havoc on tender limb, and yet
strengthen that orchard thereby
their small price paid, these wedded ones
walk forth into sun-moneyed air, quickened
to savor their span of flourishing
aloof, squatting mummy-wise, gerd scans
that clairvoyant quartz which once, at her own wishing,
exacted her first simple sight for this strict second
then, a free-gadding hoyden, gerd had craved
to govern more sight than given to a woman
by wits alone to foresee her lovers faith
and their future lot, she braved
church curse to ken that crooked oath
whereby one hires a demon
a flash like doomcrack rent nights black
gods work stood anchored in that glare
focusing all times day-suns in one
so beggar gerd might aim her look
at gorgon-prospects with power to strike to stone
hearts of those who pierced times core
what gerd saw then engraved her mind ---
plague-pitted as the moon each bud
shriveling to cinders at its source,
each love blazing blind to its gutted end ---
and, fixed in the crystal center, grinning fierce
earths ever-green deaths head
the telegram says you have gone away
and left our bankrupt circus on its town
there is nothing more for me to say
the maestro gives the singing birds their pay
and they buy tickets for the tropic zone
the telegram says you have gone away
the clever wolly dogs have had their day
they shoot the dice for one remaining bone
there is nothing more for me to say
the lion and the tigers turn to clay
and jumbo sadly trumpets into stone
the telegram says you have gone away
the morbid cobras wits have run astray
he rents his poisons out by telegram
there is nothing more for me to say
the colored tenst all topple in the bay
the magic sawdust writes address unknown
the telegram says you have gone away
there is nothing more for me to say
i made a fire being tired
of the white fists of old
letters and their death rattle
when i came too close to the wastebasket
what did they know that i didnt?
grain by grain, they unrolled
sands where a dream of clear water
grinned like a getaway car
i am not subtle
love, love, and well, i was tired
of cardboard cartons the color of cement or a dog pack
holding in its hate
dully, under a pack of men in red jackets,
and the eyes and times of the postmarks
this fire may lick and fawn, but it is merciless
a glass case
my fingers would enter although
they melt and sag, they are told
do not touch
and here is an end to the writing,
the spry hooks that bend and cringe and the smiles, the smiles
and at least it will be a good place now, the attic
at least i wont be strung just under the surface,
dumb fish
with one tin eye,
watching for glints,
riding my arctic
between this wish and that wish
so, i poke at the carbon birds in my housedress
they are more beautiful than my bodiless owl,
they console me--
rising and flying, but blinded
they would flutter off, black and glittering, they would be coal angels
only they have nothing to say but anybody
i have seen to that
with the butt of a rake
i flake up papers that breathe like people,
i fan them out
between the yellow lettuces and the german cabbage
involved in its weird blue dreams
involved in a foetus
and a name with black edges
wilts at my foot,
sinuous orchis
in a nest of root-hairs and boredom--
pale eyes, patent-leather gutturals
warm rain greases my hair, extinguishes nothing
my veins glow like trees
the dogs are tearing a fox this is what it is like
a read burst and a cry
that splits from its ripped bag and does not stop
with that dead eye
and the stuffed expression, but goes on
dyeing the air,
telling the particles of the clouds, the leaves, the water
what immortality is that it is immortal
tell me what you see in it
the pine tree like a rorschach-blot
black against the orange light
plant an orange pumpkin patch
which at twelve will quaintly hatch
nine black mice with ebon coach,
or walk into the orange and make
a devils cataract of black
obscure gods eye with corkscrew fleck
put orange mistress half in sun,
half in shade, until her skin
tattoos black leaves on tangerine
read black magic or holy book
or lyric of love in the orange and black
till dark is conquered by orange cock,
but more pragmatic than all this,
say how crafty the painter was
to make orange and black ambiguous
it is ten years, now, since we rowed to childrens island
the sun flamed straight down that noon on the water off marblehead
that summer we wore black glasses to hide our eyes
we were always crying, in our spare rooms, little put-upon sisters,
in the two, huge, white, handsome houses in swampscott
when the sweetheart from england appeared, with her cream skin and yardley cosmetics,
i had to sleep in the same room with the baby on a too-short cot,
and the seven-year-old wouldnt go out unless his jersey stripes
matched the stripes of his socks
or it was richness --- eleven rooms and a yacht
with a polished mahogany stair to let into the water
and a cabin boy who could decorate cakes in six-colored frosting
but i didnt know how to cook, and babies depressed me
nights, i wrote in my diary spitefully, my fingers red
with triangular scorch marks from ironing tiny ruchings and puffed sleeves
when the sporty wife and her doctor husband went on one of their cruises
they left me a borrowed maid named ellen, for protection,
and a small dalmation
in your house, the main house, you were better off
you had a rose garden and a guest cottage and a model apothecary shop
and a cook and a maid, and knew about the key to the bourbon
i remember you playing ja-da in a pink piqu dress
on the game-room piano, when the big people were out,
and the maid smoked and shot pool under a green shaded lamp
the cook had one walleye and couldnt sleep, she was so nervous
on trial, from ireland, she burned batch after batch of cookies
till she was fired
o what has come over us, my sister
on that day-off the two of us cried so hard to get
we lifted a sugared ham and a pineapple from the grownups icebox
and rented an old green boat i rowed you read
aloud, cross-legged on the stern seat, from the generation of vipers
so we bobbed out to the island it was deserted ---
a gallery of creaking porches and still interiors,
stopped and awful as a photograph of somebody laughing
but ten years dead
the bold gulls dove as if they owned it all
we picked up sticks of driftwood and beat them off,
then stepped down the steep beach shelf and into the water
we kicked and talked the thick salt kept us up
i see us floating there yet, inseparable--two cork dolls
what keyhole have we slipped through, what door has shut?
the shadows of the grasses inched round like hands of a clock,
and from our opposite continents we wave and call
everything has happened
in alicante they bowl the barrels
bumblingly over the nubs of the cobbles
past the yellow-paella eateries,
below the ramshackle back-alley balconies,
while the cocks and hens
in the roofgardens
scuttle repose with crowns and cackles
kumquat-colored trolleys ding as they trundle
passengers under an indigo fizzle
needling spumily down from the wires
alongside the sibliant narhor the lovers
hear loudspeakers boom
from each neon-lit palm
rumbas and sambas no ear-flaps can muffle
o cacophony, goddess of jazz and of quarrels,
crack-throated mistress of bagpipes and cymbals,
let be your con brios, your capricciosos,
crescendos, cadenzas, prestos and pretissimos,
my head on the pillow
piano, pianissimo
lullayed by susurrous lyres and viols
in the archological museum in cambridge is a stone
coffin of the fourth century ad containing the skeletons
of a woman, a mouse and a shrew the ankle-bone of the
woman has been slightly gnawed
rigged poker -stiff on her back
with a granite grin
this antique museum-cased lady
lies, companioned by the gimcrack
relics of a mouse and a shrew
that battened for a day on her ankle-bone
these three, unmasked now, bear
dry witness
to the gross eating game
wed wink at if we didnt hear
stars grinding, crumb by crumb,
our own grist down to its bony face
how they grip us through think and thick,
these barnacle dead
this lady heres no kin
of mine, yet kin she is shell suck
blood and whistle my narrow clean
to prove it as i think now of her hand,
from the mercury-backed glass
mother, grandmother, greatgrandmother
reach hag hands to haul me in,
and an image looms under the fishpond surface
where the daft father went down
with orange duck-feet winnowing this hair ---
all the long gone darlings they
get back, though, soon,
soon be it by wakes, weddings,
childbirths or a family barbecue
any touch, taste, tangs
fit for those outlaws to ride home on,
and to sanctuary usurping the armchair
between tick
and tack of the clock, until we go,
each skulled-and-crossboned gulliver
riddled with ghosts, to lie
deadlocked with them, taking roots as cradles rock
first, are you our sort of a person?
do you wear
a glass eye, false teeth or a crutch,
a brace or a hook,
rubber breasts or a rubber crotch,
stitches to show somethings missing? no, no? then
how can we give you a thing?
stop crying
open your hand
empty? empty here is a hand
to fill it and willing
to bring teacups and roll away headaches
and do whatever you tell it
will you marry it?
it is guaranteed
to thumb shut your eyes at the end
and dissolve of sorrow
we make new stock from the salt
i notice you are stark naked
how about this suit -
black and stiff, but not a bad fit
will you marry it?